http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/tuberculosis_infection_analysis TB on a plane? Sign of the times of the Web TB on a plane? Sign of the times By MIKE STOBBE, AP Medical Writer 2 hours, 17 minutes ago on a plane. Mumps on a plane. And now a rare and deadly form of tuberculosis, on at least two planes. Commercial air travel's potential for spreading infection continues to cause handwringing among public health officials, as news of a jet-setting man with a rare and deadly form of TB demonstrates. "We always think of planes as a vehicle for spreading disease," said Dr. Doug Hardy, an infectious disease specialist at UT Southwestern Medical Center in Dallas. In the latest case, a Georgia man with extensively drug-resistant TB ignored doctors' advice and took two trans-Atlantic flights, leading to the first U.S. government-ordered quarantine since 1963. The man, who officials did not identify, had been quarantined at Atlanta's Grady Memorial Hospital until Thursday morning, when he was transferred to Denver's National Jewish Hospital for treatment, Jewish Hospital spokesman William Allstetter said. He walked into the building and said he felt fine, Allstetter said. The hospital has treated two other patients with what appears to be the same strain of tuberculosis since 2000 and both improved enough to be released, according to Dr. Charles Daley, head of the infectious disease division at National Jewish. "I think we're more optimistic than what we have been hearing in reports that we will be able to control this infection," Daley told CNN Thursday morning. "We're aiming for cure. We know it's an uphill battle." The patient was not considered highly contagious, and there are no confirmed reports that his illness spread to other passengers. But the case illustrates ongoing concerns about the public health perils of plane travel, as well as the continuing problem of Typhoid Mary-like individuals who can almost be counted on to do the wrong thing. The man decided to proceed with a long-planned wedding trip despite being advised not to fly. "There's always going to be situations where there is a lack of understanding and appreciation of responsibility to the community in a situation like this," said Dr. John Ho, an infectious diseases specialist at New York-Presbyterian Hospital/Weill Cornell Medical Center. The case also points out weaknesses in the system: The man was able to re-enter the United States, even though he said he had been warned by federal officials that his passport was being flagged and he was being placed on a no-fly list. officials said they contacted the Department of to put the man on a no-fly list, but it doesn't appear he was added by the time he flew from Prague to Montreal and drove across the border from Canada. A Transportation Security Administration spokesman could not be reached for comment Wednesday. Challenges in coordinating with airlines and in communicating with the media also have emerged, said Glen Nowak, a spokesman for the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. "This clearly is going to have some relevance to our pandemic influenza preparedness," Nowak said. There have been several prominent disease-on-a-plane incidents in recent years. Perhaps best known is severe acute respiratory syndrome, or SARS, which erupted in Asia in 2003. Over three months, CDC workers delayed on the tarmac 12,000 airplanes carrying 3 million passengers arriving from SARS-affected countries, isolating people with SARS symptoms. Last year, CDC officials worked with airlines and state health departments to track two infected airline passengers who may have helped spread a mumps epidemic throughout the Midwest. And in March, a flight from Hong Kong was held at Newark International Airport for two hours because some on board reported feeling ill from a flu-like illness. They were released when it became clear they had seasonal flu, and not an avian variety. Medical experts say TB is significantly less contagious than flu, SARS and other maladies that have led to airport alerts. "This is not as easily transmissible as what we're concerned about with a flu pandemic," said Dr. William Schaffner, chairman of the department of preventive medicine at Vanderbilt University. A more contagious bug, carried by a stubborn or evasive passenger, could be much more problematic, experts said. It's remarkable how rarely serious contagions are on planes, Ho noted. "If you count the number of international flights there are on a daily basis, this is really a minuscule event" in terms of rate of occurrence, he said. "However, this underscores the interrelatedness of the global community. We can no longer escape things considered foreign" in this age of jet-travel, Ho said. Associated Press writer Malcolm Ritter in New York contributed to this report. Full Coverage: Tuberculosis Scare TB on a plane? Sign of the times TB patient in Denver for treatment US probes how TB traveler crossed border Man knew he had TB before flying to Europe at CNN.com, May 30 Tuberculosis - Getting the Facts at FOX News, May 31 Upset air travelers criticize CDC on TB alert at Atlanta Journal-Constitution, May 30 TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 Dedication set for Billy Graham library 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 son arrested on sex charge Alabama gov. signs slavery apology Marine vet faces hearing over protest TB patient moved to Denver hospital AP - 21 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 43 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP - 1 hour, 12 minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. Dr. Martin Cetron, Director, Division of Global Migration and Quarantine, CDC, during a news conference... Passengers Onboard With TB Carrier Angry Travelers on flight with tuberculosis patient are furious man put them at risk. &raquo; More ABC News video Could one tuberculosis patient infect an entire airline flight? &raquo; More ABC News video &raquo; Show all news video TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 TB patient moved to Denver hospital The Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_en_mo/harry_potter_park LINDSEY TOLER, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 1 minute ago LONDON - Universal Studios is opening up a theme park in Florida &#151; complete with the Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry, the Forbidden Forest and Hogsmeade village. "The Wizarding World of Harry Potter," will open in late 2009 in Orlando, officials said Thursday. "The plans I've seen look incredibly exciting, and I don't think fans of the books or films will be disappointed," said author , who has been working with a creative team to make sure the park resembles the books and films. More than a dozen artists and designers lead by Stuart Craig, the production designer of the movies, have set up house in the studio where the movies are being filmed to make sure every detail is considered, according to Scott Trowbridge of Universal. "We're really going to the people who know this world best to ensure that level of authenticity," he said. The Potter park will allow visitors to view the iconic locations in Rowling's magical world, like Dumbledore's office in Hogwarts and the shops in Hogsmeade. Some locations may be in upcoming books, Trowbridge said. Trowbridge said while there would not be any character lookalikes at the park, fans wanting to see Harry Potter and his magical friends wouldn't leave disappointed. "This is Harry's world," said Trowbridge. "Most every fan wants to have an encounter with the star of the show." The Harry Potter book series has been translated into 65 languages with more than 325 million copies sold in over 200 territories around the world. The fifth film in the series, "Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix," will be released in theatres on 13 July. The seventh and final book of the series will be released on 21 July. Laugh Factory make lifelong deal OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY Lohan&#39;s - 38 minutes ago Jackson items under hammer AM ET Thursday&#39;s live music lineup CNN AM ET Theme park for Potter fans AM ET Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. Entre aquí y conozca una Posible solución!. Order a free vacation planning DVD. See the Magic of Disney Parks. Hogwarts Castle - 'The Wizarding World of Harry Potter' will be anchored by the most... Theme park for Potter fans A theme park based on the boy wizard Harry Potter is to be built in Orlando, Florida. &raquo; More BBC video &raquo; Show all news video News - AP builds a living out of LEGO How Do You Spell Success? Can you wrap your head around the bandanna? Vote for your favorite movie spoof. Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_en_mo/lindsay_lohan SANDY COHEN, AP Entertainment Writer 's estranged father says she suffers from multiple addictions, including alcohol and the painkiller OxyContin, the Web site E! Online reported Wednesday. The 20-year-old actress checked into rehab Monday following a weekend that included crashing her Mercedes, being arrested for suspicion of driving under the influence and being photographed slumped in the passenger seat of a friend's car. This is her second rehab stint this year. "I spoke to the people treating Lindsay, because I wanted to make sure she was getting the right care," Michael Lohan told E! Online. "And I'm satisfied they are doing the right thing for her, helping her detox from the painkillers and things. That's a very important step." Lindsay Lohan's publicist, Leslie Sloane Zelnik, did not immediately return an after-hours call and e-mail from The Associated Press on Wednesday. Michael Lohan was released from a New York state prison in March after serving almost two years for driving while intoxicated and other charges. He said he is studying to become a drug-rehab counselor with the faith-based organization Teen Challenge. Before entering rehab, the actress was scheduled to start work this week on "Poor Things," a comedy featuring , who is also a producer on the movie. MacLaine and co-producer Rob Hickman said in a statement Wednesday that Lohan still wants to work on the project. "We are trying to rearrange the shooting schedule to facilitate her working at the end of the shoot to coincide with the completion of her rehabilitation," the statement said. In other events swirling around Lohan, who turns 21 on July 2, authorities who have been conducting undercover operations at trendy celebrity watering holes in recent weeks are seeking to find out if she was served alcohol before her weekend car crash. California Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control investigators also want to know if Lohan or others were served after hours, agency spokesman John Carr said. Videos show Lohan leaving Hollywood's Les Deux club at 3:30 a.m. Alcohol cannot be served in California after 2 a.m. The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control told the Beverly Hills Police Department it wants to review witness reports and other evidence to determine if a formal investigation is warranted, Carr said. Les Deux owner Lonnie Moore said in a statement that Lohan stayed late having dinner and waiting for friends, and wasn't drinking. Associated Press Writer Jeff Wilson contributed to this report. A previous version of this story misspelled the surname of Lindsay Lohan's publicist. Her name is Leslie Sloane Zelnik, not Zelnick. Laugh Factory make lifelong deal OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY Lohan&#39;s - 38 minutes ago Jackson items under hammer AM ET Thursday&#39;s live music lineup CNN AM ET Theme park for Potter fans AM ET Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. 1000 Raffle Tickets - $45, Free Shipping 500 for $40, 1000 for $45, 2000 for $75, 3000 for $105, 4000 for $135, 5000 for $16.5, additional 1000s only $27. Custom printed & shipped free within 24 hrs. Ask about next day delivery. Front Row Seats 100% Guaranteed Tickets 100% Guaranteed Prices and Giant selection of ALL Event Tickets: Sports, Concerts, Theater, Las Vegas and Broadway from Front Row Seats LLC. Shop securely online 24/7. Michael Lohan, the estranged father of actress Lindsay Lohan, listens to court proceedings in a... Lindsay Lohan&#39;s Dad Wants To Have Heartfelt Talk With Her Michael Lohan wants to ask his parole officer for permission to head to California to talk with his daughter, who is now in rehab. Kent Shocknek reports. &raquo; More CBS 2 / KCAL 9 Los Angeles video Lohan&#39;s father begs her to let family help The estranged father of actress Lindsay Lohan is pleading for his daughter to let her family help after she was arrested this weekend on suspicion of DUI and having a small amount of what police believe to be cocaine in her car. (May 28) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Dad: Lindsay Detoxing from Drugs, Booze builds a living out of LEGO How Do You Spell Success? Can you wrap your head around the bandanna? Vote for your favorite movie spoof. Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/civil_unions of the Web BEVERLEY WANG, Associated Press Writer CONCORD, N.H. - Gay couples in New Hampshire can start applying for many of the rights and responsibilities of marriage as early as January under a law Gov. John Lynch signed Thursday establishing civil unions. "We in New Hampshire have had a long and proud tradition taking the lead in opposing discrimination," Lynch said. "Today that tradition continues." Couples who enter civil unions will have the same rights, responsibilities and obligations as married couples. Same-sex unions from other states also would be recognized if they were legal in the state where they were performed. Legislators who gathered for the bill signing packed the governor's chambers and overflowed into an adjoining sitting room. They snapped photos and burst into applause as he signed it. "I've listened and I've heard all the arguments," said Lynch, a Democrat. "I do not believe that this bill threatens marriage. I believe that this is a matter of conscience and fairness." Episcopal Bishop V. Gene Robinson was among those attending. Although his consecration in 2003 as the first openly gay bishop in the Episcopal Church divided the worldwide Anglican Communion to which it belongs, Robinson and his longtime partner plan to take advantage of civil unions. "This is not a radical departure," Robinson said of the bill. "This is a real confirmation of what New Hampshire has always been about: the freedom of its own citizens and fairness for everyone." Robinson said he will not direct Episcopal priests in the state to bless same-sex unions, letting priests decide that individually. Such blessings have been another divisive issue for Episcopalians and the Anglican union. "That authority belongs to them and I would not in any way ask them not to do that. ... Just like in marriages, every priest will have the option to bless or not to bless," Robinson said. Massachusetts alone among the U.S. states allows gay marriage. Connecticut, Vermont, New Jersey, Maine, California and Washington allow either civil unions or domestic partnerships, and Oregon will join the list with New Hampshire in January. Hawaii extends certain spousal rights to same-sex couples and cohabiting heterosexual pairs. (This version CORRECTS name to Anglican Communion.) Full Coverage: Gay & Lesbian Issues Washington urges tolerance in TV spot Ban kept for gay men donating blood NY couples celebrate gay marriage ruling Anglican church turmoil over gay issues deepens Reuters at TIME Magazine, Feb 22 In N.J., getting an early start on civil unions at Philadelphia Inquirer (reg req'd), Feb 20 at The Washington Post Recognition of gay couples spreads at Toronto Star (reg req'd), Apr 24 TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 Dedication set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times TB on a plane? Sign of the times 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 Crusader's son arrested on sex charge Marine vet faces hearing over protest Calif. whales leave behind information TB patient moved to Denver hospital AP - 21 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 43 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP - 1 hour, 12 minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. Santiago Porrero, the owner of a wedding shop that bills itself as Europe's first to... & Lesbian Issues TB patient moved to Denver hospital The Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/ts_nm/arts_potter_dc All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster AM ET LONDON (Reuters) - J.K Rowling, who became the world&#39;s first billion dollar author on the back of &#39;s success, has given the go-ahead for the creation of a Florida theme park dedicated to the schoolboy wizard. "The plans I have seen look incredibly exciting and I don&#39;t think fans of the books or films will be disappointed," Rowling said of the Orlando park that is scheduled to open in 2009. The park is a joint venture between Warner Bros Entertainment, whose Potter films have so far grossed more than &#36;3.5 billion worldwide, and Universal Orlando Resort. In a statement rich in entertainment hyperbole, the builders of "The Wizarding World of Harry Potter" said they planned to "create the world&#39;s first immersive Harry Potter themed environment." Barry Meyer, chairman and CEO of Warner Bros. Entertainment, said: "Over the years we&#39;ve received thousands of letters from fans around the world wishing they could visit Hogwarts (School) and the wonderful locations described in each of The park&#39;s opening could help to quell the withdrawal symptoms of Potter fans around the globe who have bought 320 million copies of her wizard tales and turned every one of the films into a box office hit. Pottermania is set to scale new heights in July with the last novel hitting the bookstands and the latest film being launched in a deluge of global publicity. "Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows," the final installment in her hugely successful series, is being released on July 21. Rowling is to mark publication with a moonlight reading for fans at London&#39;s Natural History Museum. Sweepstakes are being conducted by her British publisher Bloomsbury Publishing Plc and American publisher Scholastic to pick the winning fans. "Harry Potter and the order of the Phoenix," the fifth film in a blockbuster series based on the books, is being given its official world premiere in London on July 3. Rowling, whose books are always released under tight security, has said two characters will die in the seventh and final book but she has refused to give any clues. The author has appealed to people to keep the end a secret: "I want the readers who have, in many instances, grown up with Harry, to embark on the last adventure they will share with him without knowing where they are going." U.S. authors John Irving and Stephen King were so worried about the fictional hero&#39;s fate that they urged Rowling to spare the bespectacled hero. Full Coverage: Harry Potter Rowling to give reading of new Potter Japanese debut for Potter movie Harry Potter film to premiere in Tokyo Harry Potter gets stamp of approval Reuters Harry Potter and the mystery of an academic obsession at The Guardian (UK)., Aug 06 'I'll miss Harry' says JK Rowling at BBC, Aug 02 Harry Potter and Our Forgotten History at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Jul 28 J.K. Rowling critic would be dead if recent e-mails were really fire-breathing dragons at San Francisco Chronicle, Jul 26 Economy nearly stalled in first quarter TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 residents rise up against al-Qaida Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin Bush unveils climate strategy ahead of G8 U.S. says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 China scientists shed new light on male infertility Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 21 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET British author JK Rowling, who created the bestselling Harry Potter series, wears her graduation gown... Theme park for Potter fans A theme park based on the boy wizard Harry Potter is to be built in Orlando, Florida. &raquo; More BBC video &raquo; Show all news video An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://news.yahoo.com/i/1776 Most Viewed News on Yahoo! News Panda released into wild found dead AM ET BEIJING - The first panda to be released into bamboo forests after being bred in captivity has died, and a Chinese nature preserve official said Thursday it may have fallen from trees while being chased by wild pandas. Lovitz, Laugh Factory make lifelong deal AM ET LOS ANGELES - Jon Lovitz has made a lifelong commitment &#151; to the Laugh Factory. Man described as a top spammer arrested AM ET SEATTLE - A 27-year-old man described as one of the world's most prolific spammers was arrested Wednesday, and federal authorities said computer users across the Web could notice a decrease in the amount of junk e-mail. Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race 1 hour, 58 minutes ago MOSCOW - President Vladimir Putin said Thursday that tests of new Russian missiles were a response to the planned deployment of U.S. missile defense installations and other forces in Europe, suggesting Washington has triggered a new arms race. CDC seeks those who sat near TB patient AM ET ATLANTA - Health officials in North America and Europe sought passenger lists Wednesday for two trans-Atlantic airline flights in their effort to find about 80 people who sat near a honeymooner infected with a dangerous drug-resistant form of tuberculosis. Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq 1 hour, 4 minutes ago WASHINGTON - U.S. military commanders are talking with Iraqi militants about cease-fires and other arrangements to try to stop the violence, the No. 2 American commander said Thursday. There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine 2 hours, 9 minutes ago ROME (Reuters) - Scientists have discovered particles of cocaine and marijuana, as well as caffeine and tobacco, in the air of Italy&#39;s capital, they said on Thursday. hour, 6 minutes ago LOS ANGELES - Nicole Richie admits she's "nervous" about the possibility she may follow her friend Paris Hilton to jail. TB on a plane? Sign of the times 2 hours, 17 minutes ago ATLANTA - SARS on a plane. Mumps on a plane. And now a rare and deadly form of tuberculosis, on at least two planes. Commercial air travel's potential for spreading infection continues to cause handwringing among public health officials, as news of a jet-setting man with a rare and deadly form of TB demonstrates. U.S. says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran 1 hour, 18 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - Iran has detained a fourth Iranian American, California businessman Ali Shakeri, the U.S. State Department said on Thursday, calling his arrest a "disturbing pattern" of harassment of dual citizens. 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 2 hours, 42 minutes ago FORT COLLINS, Colo. - With the 2007 Atlantic hurricane season a few hours away, researcher William Gray released his newest forecast Thursday still showing an expectation for 17 named storms and nine hurricanes, five of them intense. Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida BAGHDAD - A battle raged in west Baghdad on Thursday after residents rose up against al-Qaida and called for U.S. military help to end random gunfire that forced people to huddle indoors and threats that kept students from final exams, a member of the district council said. Economy nearly stalled in first quarter 1 hour, 40 minutes ago WASHINGTON - The economy nearly stalled in the first quarter with growth slowing to a pace of just 0.6 percent. That was the worst three-month showing in over four years. ANGELES - Lindsay Lohan's estranged father says she suffers from multiple addictions, including alcohol and the painkiller OxyContin, the Web site E! Online reported Wednesday. U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin 1 hour, 53 minutes ago MOSCOW (Reuters) - Russian President Vladimir Putin launched a scathing attack on the West on Thursday, accusing Washington of imperialism and of starting a new arms race. Bush unveils climate strategy ahead of G8 1 hour, 56 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - President George W. Bush unveiled a long-term strategy on climate change on Thursday, with plans to gather the countries that emit the most greenhouse gases and set a global emissions goal. hour, 2 minutes ago LONDON - Universal Studios is opening up a Florida &#151; complete with the Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry, the Forbidden Forest and Hogsmeade village. N.H. - Gay couples in New Hampshire can start applying for many of the rights and responsibilities of marriage as early as January under a law Gov. John Lynch signed Thursday establishing civil unions. hours, 42 minutes ago LOS ANGELES - Good news for Harry Potter fans awaiting release of the boy wizard's next movie. "Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix," the fifth movie based on the best-selling books, will open in U.S. theaters July 11, two days earlier than expected. Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; 2 hours, 51 minutes ago MOSCOW (AFP) - President Vladimir Putin issued an acerbic warning Thursday to the United States, saying the recent test of a new Russian missile was a direct response to US actions and condemning "imperialism" in world affairs. All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster AM ET LONDON (Reuters) - J.K Rowling, who became the world&#39;s first billion dollar author on the back of Harry Potter&#39;s success, has given the go-ahead for the creation of a Florida theme park dedicated to the schoolboy wizard. Finger length may foretell academic potential Wed May 30, 3:01 PM ET NEW YORK (Reuters Health) - The length of children&#39;s fingers may hint at their natural abilities in math and language, a new study suggests. Musician canned for focus on wrong organ Wed May 30, 11:06 PM ET NEW FRANKEN, Wis. - A Catholic priest has removed his church's organist and choir director from her duties saying her sale of sex toys was not "consistent with Church teachings." Couple sue Wal-Mart over slip in vomit Wed May 30, 9:57 PM ET DAVENPORT, Iowa - A woman's fall in a puddle of vomit has resulted in a lawsuit against Wal-Mart. June Medema, slipped in the vomit at a Davenport Wal-Mart on June 13, 2005, according to the lawsuit, filed by Medema and her husband, James, in Scott County District Court earlier this month. WOMAN OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY Wed May 30, 7:57 PM ET DEAR ABBY: When my husband came home from work this evening, he told me a horrifying story. He said that he and some of his co-workers were out on a job, and from their truck they witnessed a woman in a wheelchair topple. They waited for the stoplight to turn green and immediately made their way to her side as quickly as they could. The New York Times poses as she arrives at the Clive Davis pre-Grammy party in Beverly Hills February 12, 2005 file photo. Delaney stars in "Army Wives," a dramatized the lives of soldiers fighting a war while the fighting was still taking place. REUTERS/Fred Prouser" height="130" width="72" border="0" title="Actress Kim Delaney poses as she arrives at the Clive Davis ..."/> at Sunset Boulevard and Foothill Road, right rear, in Beverly Hills, Calif, Tuesday, May 29, 2007. Lohan was arrested on suspicion of driving under the influence after her convertible struck a curb in Beverly Hills, and investigators found what they believe is cocaine at the scene, police said. (AP Photo/Reed Saxon)" height="77" width="130" border="0" title="Without leaving his car, a man takes a mobile phone photo of ..."/> final in Mexico City&#39;s Auditorio Nacional May 28, 2007. Guimaraes was the first runner up. REUTERS/Andrew Winning (MEXICO)" height="130" width="103" border="0" title="Miss Brazil Natalia Guimaraes poses during the swimwear section ..."/> series, wears her graduation gown at Marischal College in Aberdeen, Scotland, where she received a honorary Doctorate Of Laws degree from Aberdeen University, July 6, 2006. She has given the go-ahead for the creation of a Florida theme park dedicated to the schoolboy wizard. (David Moir/Reuters)" height="90" width="130" border="0" title="British author JK Rowling, who created the bestselling Harry ..."/> poses as she arrives at the 2007/8 Chanel Cruise Show presented by Karl Lagerfeld, Friday, May 18, 2007, in Santa Monica, Calif. (AP Photo/Mark J. Terrill)" height="130" width="70" border="0" title="Lindsay Lohan poses as she arrives at the 2007/8 Chanel Cruise ..."/> which is expected to open in late 2009 or early 2010 in Orlando in Florida. Harry Potter author has given her blessing to a US theme park based on the hugely popular schoolboy wizard, to be built in Florida, officials said.(AFP/HO)" height="96" width="130" border="0" title="A handout image shows an impression of &#39;Hogwarts Castle&#39; ..."/> poses at the 'Us Hot Hollywood 2007' party in Los Angeles in this April 26, 2007 file photo. Lohan has returned to rehab after a weekend drunken-driving arrest, her publicist said on Tuesday, raising questions about whether she can start shooting her latest film as planned. (Mario Anzuoni/Reuters)" height="92" width="130" border="0" title="Actress Lindsay Lohan poses at the 'Us Hot Hollywood 2007' party ..."/>
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/ts_nm/climate_bush_dc Bush unveils climate strategy ahead of G8 unveils climate strategy ahead of G8 By Deborah Zabarenko and Caren Bohan 1 hour, 56 minutes ago President George W. Bush President George W. Bush unveiled a long-term strategy on climate change on Thursday, with plans to gather the countries that emit the most greenhouse gases and set a global emissions goal. Bush would also cut tariff barriers to sharing environmental technology as part of a strategy announced as he prepared to attend a Group of Eight summit in Germany next weekly likely to be dominated by addressing global climate change. The U.S. strategy calls for consensus on long-term goals for reducing the greenhouse gases that spur global warming, but not before the end of 2008, White House spokeswoman Dana Perino said. Bush plans in the fall to convene the first in a series of meetings on ways to limit global emissions by a set amount by about 2050. About 15 countries would be invited, including two nations that like the United States are major polluters, China and India. "The United States takes this issue seriously," Bush said. In negotiations before the summit, Washington rejected setting targets to reduce greenhouse gases, championed by other participants. The plan calls for eliminating tariff barriers within six months, freeing up the distribution of new environmentally friendly technology. The gathering of the biggest greenhouse gas countries -- those that spew a combined 80 percent of the world&#39;s emissions -- should take place in the United States this fall, the official said. The meeting will likely include the G8 developed countries, fast-developing China and India, and Brazil, Australia, South Africa, Mexico, Perino made clear the United States would continue to reject a European push for a proposal aimed at addressing global climate change through Kyoto-style caps on carbon emissions. "We do not endorse global carbon trading," Perino said. Full Coverage: Climate Change Bush calls for global emissions goals AP, 24 minutes ago Bush unveils new climate change plan AFP, 25 minutes ago Global carbon emissions in overdrive The Christian Science Monitor Leo and 'The 11th Hour' at The Los Angeles Times US urges new greenhouse gas goals Everest ice forest melting due to global warming, says Greenpeace at The Guardian (UK)., May 30 Lead or Step Aside, EPA at The Washington Post Climate and the UN: A new bid for control? Economy nearly stalled in first quarter TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 residents rise up against al-Qaida Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin U.S. says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 China scientists shed new light on male infertility Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 21 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET Traffic passes through a haze of smog in downtown Los Angeles in this November 19,... George W. Bush An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit The Christian Science Monitor Tasks for next World Bank chief: heal rifts, tackle poverty People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_en_tv/people_thompson LYNN ELBER, AP Television Writer Wed May 30, 9:00 PM ET LOS ANGELES - Fred Thompson, edging toward a presidential run, is giving up his day job playing a prosecutor on the TV series "Law & Order." Thompson asked Wednesday to be released from the show after five seasons, series creator and executive producer Dick Wolf said. "Although he told me he has not made a firm decision about his political future, he felt that given the creative and scheduling constraints of the upcoming season," he should leave "Law & Order," Wolf said in a statement. The producer lauded Thompson's commitment to "Law & Order" and the new TV movie "Bury My Heart at Wounded Knee," in which the actor plays a president &#151; Ulysses S. Grant. The film, which Wolf produced, premiered last Sunday on HBO. Thompson, 64, a former U.S. senator from Tennessee, has yet to announce he's seeking the GOP nomination but has taken steps toward a summer entry into the crowded field. He has been casting himself in speeches and on the Internet as a Reaganesque conservative. Thompson, a lawyer, began his acting career with the film "Marie" in 1985, about a high-profile legal case he handled in Tennessee and in which he played himself. His credits also include "In the Line of Fire" and "The Hunt for Red October." Thompson served in the Senate from 1994 to 2002, resuming his Hollywood career when he left. On NBC's "Law & Order," which has been renewed for its 18th year, he played New York District Attorney Arthur Branch. Laugh Factory make lifelong deal OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY - 39 minutes ago Jackson items under hammer AM ET Thursday&#39;s live music lineup CNN AM ET Theme park for Potter fans AM ET Find Adventure at Disney® Experience a Disney Vacation. Order a Free Vacation Planning DVD. Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. Entre aquí y conozca una Posible solución!. Former U.S. Sen. Fred Thompson attends the Prescott Bush Awards Dinner, in this May 24,... News - AP builds a living out of LEGO How Do You Spell Success? Can you wrap your head around the bandanna? Vote for your favorite movie spoof. Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_hi_te/spam_arrest Man described as a top spammer arrested described as a top spammer arrested By GENE JOHNSON, AP Legal Affairs Writer AM ET SEATTLE - A 27-year-old man described as one of the world's most prolific spammers was arrested Wednesday, and federal authorities said computer users across the Web could notice a decrease in the amount of junk e-mail. Robert Alan Soloway is accused of using networks of compromised "zombie" computers to send out millions upon millions of spam e-mails. "He's one of the top 10 spammers in the world," said Tim Cranton, a Microsoft Corp. lawyer who is senior director of the company's Worldwide Internet Safety Programs. "He's a huge problem for our customers. This is a very good day." A federal grand jury last week returned a 35-count indictment against Soloway charging him with mail fraud, wire fraud, e-mail fraud, aggravated identity theft and money laundering. Soloway pleaded not guilty Wednesday afternoon to all charges after a judge determined that &#151; even with four bank accounts seized by the government &#151; he was sufficiently well off to pay for his own lawyer. He has been living in a ritzy apartment and drives an expensive Mercedes convertible, said prosecutor Kathryn Warma. Prosecutors are seeking to have him forfeit $773,000 they say he made from his business, Newport Internet Marketing Corp. A public defender who represented him for Wednesday's hearing declined to comment. Prosecutors say Soloway used computers infected with malicious code to send out millions of junk e-mails since 2003. The computers are called "zombies" because owners typically have no idea their machines have been infected. He continued his activities even after Microsoft won a $7 million civil judgment against him in 2005 and the operator of a small Internet service provider in Oklahoma won a $10 million judgment, prosecutors said. U.S. Attorney Jeff Sullivan said Wednesday that the case is the first in the country in which federal prosecutors have used identity theft statutes to prosecute a spammer for taking over someone else's Internet domain name. Soloway could face decades in prison, though prosecutors said they have not calculated what guideline sentencing range he might face. The investigation began when the authorities began receiving hundreds of complaints about Soloway, who had been featured on a list of known spammers kept by The Spamhaus Project, an international anti-spam organization. The Santa Barbara County, Calif., Department of Social Services said it was spending $1,000 a week to fight the spam it was receiving, and other businesses and individuals complained of having their reputations damaged when it appeared spam was originating from their computers. "This is not just a nuisance. This is way beyond a nuisance," Warma said. Soloway used the networks of compromised computers to send out unsolicited bulk e-mails urging people to use his Internet marketing company to advertise their products, authorities said. People who clicked on a link in the e-mail were directed to his Web site. There, Soloway advertised his ability to send out as many as 20 million e-mail advertisements over 15 days for $495, the indictment said. The Spamhaus Project rejoiced at his arrest. "Soloway has been a long-term nuisance on the Internet &#151; both in terms of the spam he sent, and the people he duped to use his spam service," organizers wrote on Spamhaus.org. Soloway remained in federal detention pending a hearing Monday. Full Coverage: Internet and WWW Apple to put YouTube on Apple TV Reuters, Wed May 30, 8:16 PM ET Viacom welcomes licensing opportunity from Apple TV Reuters, Wed May 30, 8:05 PM ET Coping with death on the web Online, GOP Is Playing Catch-Up at The Washington Post Connecticut To Require Sex Offender E-Mail Registration NewsFactor Web 2.0 'distracts good design' A shameful surrender to pornographers at Christian Science Monitor, Apr 02 Step cautiously into an online bank at Christian Science Monitor, Apr 02 Chip sales expected to grow by 2.5 pct. Five cos. win gov't telecom contract Japanese robot dances to iPod music Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance U.S. soldiers face tough VOIP call Five cos. win gov't telecom contract Google takes big step to make Web work offline Palm unveils new laptop-like gadget Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance Hong Kong cracks down on spam Technology & Health Video Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Apple says YouTube coming to Apple TV AP - 1 hour, 21 minutes ago Palm unveils new laptop-like gadget AP minutes ago Convertible crash test results CNN AM ET Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Learn More About the Hitachi Hybrid & Hold Two Camcorders in One Hand. Nationwide Onsite Service & Support Troubleshooting, Upgrades, Training troubleshooting, Training, Networking, Upgrades, Graphics, Database, Digital Video. A 27-year-old man described as one of the world's most prolific spammers was arrested Wednesday,... coffee table computer &#39;I Became My Own Big Brother&#39; Swedes open embassy in Second Life See what's new in Windows Vista. The day's most popular tech news. People of the Web A grandfather- grandson team soothes souls with online hugs.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_en_mo/film_harry_potter hours, 43 minutes ago LOS ANGELES - Good news for fans awaiting release of the boy wizard's next movie. "Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix," the fifth movie based on the best-selling books, will open in U.S. theaters July 11, two days earlier than expected. The film, directed by David Yates, was scheduled to be released July 13. Warner Bros., which is distributing the film, gave no explanation for the change. The world premiere of the movie will be held June 28 in Tokyo, followed by a London premiere July 3. The film franchise is based on the best-selling novels by The seventh and final book in the series, "Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows," is still scheduled for release July 21. Full Coverage: Harry Potter Rowling to give reading of new Potter Japanese debut for Potter movie Harry Potter film to premiere in Tokyo Harry Potter gets stamp of approval Reuters Harry Potter and the mystery of an academic obsession at The Guardian (UK)., Aug 06 'I'll miss Harry' says JK Rowling at BBC, Aug 02 Harry Potter and Our Forgotten History at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Jul 28 J.K. Rowling critic would be dead if recent e-mails were really fire-breathing dragons at San Francisco Chronicle, Jul 26 Laugh Factory make lifelong deal OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY - 39 minutes ago Jackson items under hammer AM ET Thursday&#39;s live music lineup CNN AM ET Theme park for Potter fans AM ET Find Adventure at Disney® Experience a Disney Vacation. Order a Free Vacation Planning DVD. Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. Front Row Seats 100% Guaranteed Tickets 100% Guaranteed Prices and Giant selection of ALL Event Tickets: Sports, Concerts, Theater, Las Vegas and Broadway from Front Row Seats LLC. Shop securely online 24/7. In this artist rendering provided by Universal Orlando 'The Wizarding World of Harry Potter' at... News - AP builds a living out of LEGO How Do You Spell Success? Can you wrap your head around the bandanna? Vote for your favorite movie spoof. Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_en_tv/nicole_richie hour, 6 minutes ago admits she's "nervous" about the possibility she may follow her friend Richie was charged with DUI in February. Police say she was under the influence of booze and an unspecified drug when they stopped her last year. Richie told Ryan Seacrest on his radio show on KIIS-FM) in Los Angeles that she understands she has to "take responsibility" and "deal with whatever consequences" come her way. Richie also denied a report that she'd been in rehab recently. She says the rumor started because she hadn't been seen in a few weeks. Richie says she was touring with her boyfriend Joel Madden of Good Charlotte. Laugh Factory make lifelong deal OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY Lohan&#39;s - 39 minutes ago Jackson items under hammer AM ET Thursday&#39;s live music lineup CNN AM ET Theme park for Potter fans AM ET Find Adventure at Disney® Experience a Disney Vacation. Order a Free Vacation Planning DVD. Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. Entre aquí y conozca una Posible solución!. News - AP builds a living out of LEGO How Do You Spell Success? Can you wrap your head around the bandanna? Vote for your favorite movie spoof. Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_en_tv/people_lovitz Lovitz, Laugh Factory make lifelong deal Laugh Factory make lifelong deal AM ET has made a lifelong commitment &#151; to the Laugh Factory. The comic announced Wednesday that he has signed a contract to appear at the Sunset Strip club every Wednesday night for the rest of his life. "Or, if he's in New York to do a movie or something, he can appear at the Laugh Factory there. But he's committed to every Wednesday night," club owner Jamie Masada said. Lovitz said he's expecting a long run. "Who knows? I could become the of Los Angeles," he said. "God knows I've got enough Hawaiian shirts." As part of the deal, the 49-year-old "Saturday Night Live" alum will also write a Laugh Factory blog giving advice to up-and-coming comedians. "His contract is very lucrative," Masada quipped. "If he lives to be 100 years old, I'll owe him part of the club." OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY - 39 minutes ago Jackson items under hammer AM ET Thursday&#39;s live music lineup CNN AM ET Theme park for Potter fans AM ET Find Adventure at Disney® Experience a Disney Vacation. Order a Free Vacation Planning DVD. Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. Entre aquí y conozca una Posible solución!. Actor Jon Lovitz poses on the press line at 'The 14th Annual Race to Erase... builds a living out of LEGO How Do You Spell Success? Can you wrap your head around the bandanna? Vote for your favorite movie spoof. Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_as/china_panda_death Panda released into wild found dead released into wild found dead By AUDRA ANG, Associated Press Writer AM ET BEIJING - The first panda to be released into bamboo forests after being bred in captivity has died, and a Chinese nature preserve official said Thursday it may have fallen from trees while being chased by wild pandas. The body of Xiang Xiang was found Feb. 19 on snow-covered ground in the forests of Sichuan province in China's southwest, the Xinhua News Agency said. He survived less than a year in the wild after nearly three years of training in survival techniques and defense tactics. "Xiang Xiang died of serious internal injuries in the left side of his chest and stomach by falling from a high place," Heng Yi, an official from the Wolong Giant Panda Research Center in Sichuan, said in a telephone interview. "The scratches and other minor injuries caused by other wild pandas were found on his body," he said. "So Xiang Xiang may have fallen from trees when being chased by those pandas." Heng said the long delay in announcing Xiang Xiang's death was attributed to the need for a full investigation. "We are all sad about Xiang Xiang, but it doesn't mean the project has failed," Zhang Hemin, the center's head, was quoted as saying by Xinhua. "The lessons we have learnt from what happened to Xiang Xiang will help us adapt and improve the project." The 176-pound male panda was released from Wolong in April 2006 and had been trained for almost three years on how to survive in the wild. Xiang Xiang, whose name means auspicious, learned how to build a den, forage for food and mark his territory, experts at Wolong have said. He also developed defensive skills such as howling and biting. According to Li Desheng, deputy director of the Wolong center, Xiang Xiang's case shows that proves that wild panda communities are reluctant to accept male outsiders. "We chose Xiang Xiang because we thought that a strong male panda would have a better chance of surviving in the harsh natural environment," Li was quoted as saying. "But the other male pandas clearly saw Xiang Xiang as a threat. Next time we will choose a female panda." State media last year said that Xiang Xiang hesitated for a second when the door of his cage was opened, then scampered off into a nearby bamboo forest where he was tracked by a global positioning device attached to his collar. He has been buried at the foot of a mountain, about eight miles from the Wolong center, Li said. There are only about 1,600 wild pandas in the mountain forests of central China &#151; the only place in the world they are found &#151; and more than 180 live in captivity. Pandas are threatened by loss of habitat, poaching and a low reproduction rate. Females in the wild typically have a cub once every two to three years. Full Coverage: Endangered and Threatened Species Freed Chinese panda dies in wild Palm oil puts squeeze on Asia's endangered orangutan Reuters Rhinos running out of space - conservationists Reuters Scientists seek approval to kill sharks Pulling species from the brink at BBC, Mar 19 Macquarie's feral cats: a delicate ecological balance at The Independent (UK), Feb 21 A Fungus Brings Dinosaurs Fate to Frogs at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Feb 21 President Bush v. polar bears at Albuquerque Tribune, Jan 09 Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Hezbollah, Syria denounce U.N. tribunal Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty AP - 1 hour, 1 minute ago hour, 22 minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Giant panda 'Xiang Xiang' is anaesthetized for a health checkup the Wolong Giant Panda Protection... Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild Panda born in captivity and then released into the wild was found dead. &raquo; More ABC News video Panda dies after release from captivity A 5-year-old panda - who last year became the first to be released into the wild after being bred in captivity - has died. (May 31) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video & Pets News elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/hurricane_forecast 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 of the Web 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 2 hours, 43 minutes ago FORT COLLINS, Colo. - With the 2007 Atlantic hurricane season a few hours away, researcher William Gray released his newest forecast Thursday still showing an expectation for 17 named storms and nine hurricanes, five of them intense. Gray, based at Colorado State University, described it as a very active season. He said there was a 74 percent chance of a major hurricane making landfall somewhere on the U.S. coast. There is a 50 percent chance of a major hurricane making landfall on the East Coast, including the Florida Peninsula, according to the new forecast; the long-term average is 31 percent. The chance of a major hurricane hitting the Gulf Coast between the Florida Panhandle and Brownsville, Texas, is 49 percent; the long-term average is 30 percent. There is also an above-average chance of a major hurricane making landfall in the Caribbean, according to the forecast. Thursday's forecast was largely unchanged from Gray's last forecast, released in early April. "We expect an above-average hurricane season," said Phil Klotzbach, a member of Gray's team and lead author of the forecast. The Atlantic hurricane season, which runs from June 1 to Nov. 30, averages 9.6 named storms, 5.9 hurricanes and 2.3 intense hurricanes per year. There were 10 named Atlantic storms last year and five hurricanes, two of them major. None of the hurricanes hit the U.S. Atlantic coast. The devastating 2005 season set a record with 28 named storms, 15 of them hurricanes. Four hurricanes hit the U.S. coast, the worst among them Katrina, which devastated parts of the Gulf Coast. Full Coverage: Tropical Storms and Hurricanes Tropical Storm Barbara weakens in Mexico AP, 8 minutes ago Poll: Coast not ready for hurricanes AP, 1 hour, 48 minutes ago Drones Expected to Be New Eye Into Little-Seen Part of Hurricanes at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Oct 03 Your pictures: Preparing for Florence at BBC, Sep 11 Study Finds Hurricanes Frequent in Some Cooler Periods at The New York Times Coastal areas brace for a busy season with 7 to 10 hurricanes forecast at Sun Sentinel, May 22 By any other name at The American Spectator, Sep 30 The next one kind as Ernesto at Miami Herald (reg. req'd), Aug 31 TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times TB on a plane? Sign of the times son arrested on sex charge Alabama gov. signs slavery apology Marine vet faces hearing over protest TB patient moved to Denver hospital AP - 22 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 44 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP - 1 hour, 13 minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. Bill Proenza, new director of the National Hurricane Center, talks to the media next to... Tropical Storms and Hurricanes Engineering students are simulating a hurricane&#39;s winds to build better houses. CNN&#39;s John Zarrella reports. (May 29) &raquo; More CNN video &raquo; Show all news video and Tropical Storms TB patient moved to Denver hospital The Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ucda/20070530/lf_ucda/womanoutofwheelchairisignoredbypassersby WOMAN OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY By Abigail Van Buren Wed May 30, 7:57 PM ET DEAR ABBY: When my husband came home from work this evening, he told me a horrifying story. He said that he and some of his co-workers were out on a job, and from their truck they witnessed a woman in a wheelchair topple. They waited for the stoplight to turn green and immediately made their way to her side as quickly as they could. What was upsetting was that nearly 20 pedestrians walked right by without offering to help her. Abby, they didn't even look twice! The woman was extremely embarrassed to have been on the ground so long and was overjoyed when my husband and his co-workers helped her. I cannot believe that no one stopped to help. What is happening to this world? -- HORRIFIED IN DOVER, DEL. DEAR HORRIFIED: There are still many caring and compassionate people in this world. As to what happened on that street in Dover that day, I will leave it up to the good citizens of that city to consider. Perhaps everyone who passed thought the person walking behind them would take the time to help. Of course, that's no excuse. How sad -- not only for the woman with the disability but also for those who walked by. DEAR ABBY: My brother, "Dustin," has finally decided to marry his live-in girlfriend of four years, "Cameron." They are now planning their wedding, which will take place in four months. My mother has just informed me that Dustin and Cameron have decided that their wedding will be "adults only" except for Dustin's son. (The boy is 8.) Abby, my brother didn't even have the courage to call me up and inform me of this. I feel that since it will be an informal, small family event -- fewer than 20 people -- my two children should be allowed to attend. (They are 8 and 3.) Am I being unreasonable? I feel if there is a "no kids" rule, then there should be no kids -- period. My husband has refused to attend unless our children are included. Should I go alone or not attend? -- FURIOUS IN VANCOUVER, WASH. DEAR FURIOUS: The problem with getting messages via "Mother Central" is that they can be incomplete or garbled. Pick up the phone, call your brother and ask him about this. It is possible that your nephew is not going to be a "guest" at the wedding, but rather a member of the wedding party. Whatever answer you are given, respect it. Your husband can do as he wishes, but do not boycott the wedding to punish your brother. You could regret it later. DEAR ABBY: There is a boy I am dating, and I really like him. But I'm scared to kiss him. I'm a person who acts like she knows everything, but the truth is I don't really know how to kiss. Now, I know this sounds weird, but I'm only 12. I wrote to you 'cause I need to trust someone, and I hope that person is you. Just so you know, so far you are the only 1 I can trust 4 now or 4-ever. Please answer soon! -- "TINA" IN TUCSON DEAR "TINA": Thank U 4 the compliment. Please try not to obsess about not knowing how to kiss. I promise it will happen naturally, when the time is right. The boy you are dating is probably wondering how to kiss you, so hold off and let him make the first move. Then close your eyes, purse your lips and keep both feet on the ground. Dear Abby is written by Abigail Van Buren, also known as Jeanne Phillips, and was founded by her mother, Pauline Phillips. Write Dear Abby at or P.O. Box 69440, Los Angeles, CA 90069. For everything you need to know about wedding planning, order "How to Have a Lovely Wedding." Send a business-size, self-addressed envelope, plus check or money order for $6 (U.S. funds only) to: Dear Abby, Wedding Booklet, P.O. Box 447, Mount Morris, IL 61054-0447. (Postage is included.) Laugh Factory make lifelong deal - 39 minutes ago Jackson items under hammer AM ET Thursday&#39;s live music lineup CNN AM ET Theme park for Potter fans AM ET Find Adventure at Disney® Experience a Disney Vacation. Order a Free Vacation Planning DVD. Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. Entre aquí y conozca una Posible solución!. - Dear Abby builds a living out of LEGO How Do You Spell Success? Can you wrap your head around the bandanna? Vote for your favorite movie spoof. Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls. Press Syndicate. Distributed by
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/ts_nm/iran_usa_citizen_dc U.S. says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran 1 hour, 19 minutes ago has detained a fourth Iranian American, California businessman Ali Shakeri, the U.S. State Department said on Thursday, calling his arrest a "disturbing pattern" of harassment of dual citizens. "He has also been taken into custody by Iranian officials," State Department spokesman Tom Casey told reporters, saying he believed Shakeri had been detained about 10 days ago and was being held in Tehran&#39;s Evin prison. Shakeri is the fourth Iranian American to be detained, imprisoned or otherwise barred from leaving Iran in recent months in a series of incidents that U.S. diplomats fear may herald a further deterioration in U.S.-Iranian relations. The other three -- academic Haleh Esfandiari, social scientist Kian Tajbakhsh and journalist Parnaz Azima -- have been charged with spying, a charge which could carry the death sentence under Iran&#39;s Islamic sharia law. The United States has denied the three are U.S. spies and demanded their release, saying that they are private citizens who went Iran to meet family and have ordinary professional contacts. Tehran accuses Washington of using intellectuals and others inside the country to undermine the Islamic Republic through what it calls a "velvet revolution." Last week the Center for Citizen Peacebuilding at the University of California at Irvine, an institute that seeks to promote peace and where Shakeri serves on an advisory board, said he was in Iran and had not been heard from since March. "What we are seeing is a disturbing pattern on the part of the Iranians of efforts to harass these innocent people," Casey said, saying he was aware of media reports Shakeri had been, or was on the verge of being, charged but could not confirm them. The United States, which cut diplomatic ties with Iran after the 1979 Islamic revolution and the taking of hostages at the U.S. embassy there, is embroiled in disputes with Tehran over its nuclear program and its suspected support for the insurgency in Iran says its nuclear program is not to produce atomic bombs, as the United State suspects, but rather to generate electricity to it can export more oil and gas. It has also denied U.S. accusations it is fueling the violence in Iraq. Despite the disagreements, the United States and Iran held their most high-profile talks in three decades in Baghdad on Monday. The talks focused on Iraq&#39;s sectarian violence and did not touch on issues like Tehran&#39;s nuclear ambitions. Fourth Iranian-American detained in Iran AP, 24 minutes ago Calls for Iranian flexibility at nuclear talks with EU AFP, 25 minutes ago Iran, US talk on Iraq: now what? The Christian Science Monitor Tehran officials charge three Americans with spying at The Guardian (UK)., May 30 Iran links Iraq and nuclear issue Psychological warfare between the US and Iran The Christian Science Monitor Next Step on Iran at The Washington Post Economy nearly stalled in first quarter TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 residents rise up against al-Qaida Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin Bush unveils climate strategy ahead of G8 May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 China scientists shed new light on male infertility Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 21 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_go_ca_st_pe/us_iraq Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq eyed to stop violence in Iraq By PAULINE JELINEK, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 5 minutes ago WASHINGTON - U.S. military commanders are talking with Iraqi militants about cease-fires and other arrangements to try to stop the violence, the No. 2 American commander said Thursday. And he suggested he might not be able to strictly meet the September deadline for telling Congress whether 's military build up in Lt. Gen. Raymond Odierno said commanders at all levels are being empowered to reach out for talks with militants, tribes, religious leaders and others in the country that has been gripped by violence on a range of fronts including insurgents, sectarian rivals and common criminals. "It's just beginning, so we have a lot of work to do in this," he said. "But we have restructured ourselves ... to work this issue." He said he thinks 80 percent of Iraqis &#151; including Sunni insurgents and Shia militants &#151; can reach reconciliation with each other, though most al-Qaida operatives won't. "We are talking about cease-fires, and maybe signing some things that say they won't conduct operations against the government of Iraq or against coalition forces.," Odierno told reporters in a video conference from Baghdad. On the assessment of operations that is due in September, he said he thinks it will take longer to tell whether the increase of nearly 30,000 troops will work as intended &#151; that is, to quell violence enough to give Iraqi officials breathing space to work on reconciliation and development issues. "The way I understand it, is we're going to be required to provide an assessment in September. So I will provide my assessment," Odierno said, adding it might not be complete. He said he will be able to assess the work of forces that arrived for the beginning of the build up in February, but that the ones just arrived this week won't be in place for a couple of weeks &#151; meaning it will be August before he might be able to tell how they're doing. "So that'll be the first time I'll be able to make a real initial assessment of the true affect of the surge," he said. "The assessment might be 'I need a little more time. ' The assessment might be, 'I've seen enough, and it's effective or I've seen enough, and it's not going to be effective.' "Right now if you asked me, I would tell you I'll probably need a little bit more time to do a true assessment," he said. "If I think I might need a little bit more time, I will give an assessment saying, 'But I'd like to have more time'," Odierno said. He said the increased effort by commanders to reach out to militants goes hand in hand with reconciliation efforts by the Iraqi government. Odierno noted that efforts to engage tribal leaders in Anbar province &#151; who have been turning against al-Qaida there &#151; has helped draw people to serve in the Iraqi security forces in record numbers and has helped reduce attacks there. For example, the attacks in Anbar in May 2006 totaled 811, while this May they were just barely over 400, Odierno said. Since the beginning of 2007, over 12,000 Iraqi citizens have volunteered for Iraqi security forces in Anbar. In all of 2006, only 1,000 had volunteered. Prime Minister Nouri al-Maliki and other leaders are under increasing pressure from Washington to do more to achieve reconciliation among factions because, officials argue, no amount of military force can bring peace to the country without political peace. Al-Maliki announced a national reconciliation proposal nearly a year ago that has made limited progress. It offered some amnesty to members of the Sunni-led insurgency and a change in a law that had removed senior members of 's Baath Party from their jobs. "I believe there are elements that are irreconcilable, but I believe the large majority are," Odierno said. "I believe about 80 percent are reconcilable, both Jaish al-Mahdi as well as Sunni insurgents," though very few of al-Qaida. "There will be always people that are irreconcilable and ... the Iraqi government, with our support, will have to continue to conduct operations against those forces," he said. "Prime Minister Maliki and the government of Iraq have to continue to reach out to all these groups ... bringing these groups into the political process so we can deal with their differences in a peaceful way instead of in violent ways,:" Odierno said. Associated Press Writer Lolita Baldor contributed to this report. Iraq bomber kills 20, Sunni militants clash Reuters, 25 minutes ago Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida AP, 28 minutes ago Where life is cheap and easy to take at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 30 Life in a remote US Army outpost in Iraq: IEDs, DVDs, and A/C The Christian Science Monitor Many killed in Iraq suicide bomb Search continues for Iraq Britons The Hard Truth About Leaving Iraq RealClearPolitics at The New York Times Bush calls for global emissions goals Edwards wants probe of high gas prices sees South Korea model for Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Rice holds line on Iran nuclear program Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Thompson moves toward White House bid Former U.S. security boss blasts furore over Dubai Ports Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP - 1 hour, 13 minutes ago CNN - 1 hour, 21 minutes ago Stephanopoulos on Fred Thompson AM ET Raw Politics: Watchdogs barking CNN AM ET Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Residents of Sadr city, Baghdad inspect a damaged car after a joint U.S.-Iraqi forces raid,... House News - AP urges 15 nations to set global emissions goal Brinkley Describes Reagan&#39;s Inner Narrative Bush calls for global emissions goals "What would you include in legislation to address global warming?" Offer your ideas. SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_bi_go_ec_fi/economy Economy nearly stalled in first quarter nearly stalled in first quarter By JEANNINE AVERSA, AP Economics Writer 1 hour, 41 minutes ago WASHINGTON - The economy nearly stalled in the first quarter with growth slowing to a pace of just 0.6 percent. That was the worst three-month showing in over four years. The new reading on the gross domestic product, released by the Thursday, showed that economic growth in the January-through-March quarter was much weaker. Government statisticians slashed by more than half their first estimate of a 1.3 percent growth rate for the quarter. The main culprits for the downgrade: the bloated trade deficit and businesses cutting investment in supplies of the goods they hold in inventories. "We are still keeping our head above water &#151; barely," said economist Ken Mayland of ClearView Economics. For nearly a year, the economy has been enduring a stretch of subpar economic growth due mostly to a sharp housing slump. That in turn has made some businesses act more cautiously in their spending and investing. The economy's 0.6 percent growth rate in the opening quarter of this year marked a big loss of momentum from the 2.5 percent pace logged in the final quarter of last year. Chairman Ben Bernanke doesn't believe the economy will slide into recession this year, nor do Bush administration officials. But ex-Fed chief has put the odds at one in three. On Wall Street, investors took the weak showing in stride. The Dow Jones industrials were up 22 points and the Nasdaq gained 14 points in morning trading. The first-quarter's performance was the weakest since the final quarter of 2002, when the economy was recovering from a recession. At that time, GDP eked out a 0.2 percent growth rate. Economists were predicting the first-quarter performance this year would be downgraded, but not as much as it did. They were calling for a 0.8 percent pace. GDP measures the value of all goods and services produced in the United States. It is considered the best measure of the country's economic fitness. In other economic news, the Labor Department reported that fewer people signed up for unemployment benefits last week. New filings dropped by 4,000 to 310,000. That suggests the employment climate is weathering well the economy's sluggish spell. Another report showed that construction spending edged up by 0.1 percent in April, down from a 0.6 percent gain in the previous month. Spending by private builders on nonresidential projects and spending by the government on big projects each climbed to all time highs in April but that strength was tempered by continued weakness in residential construction. In the GDP report, many economists believe the first quarter will be the low point for this year. They expect growth will improve but still be sluggish. The National Association for Business Economics predicts the economy will expand at a 2.3 percent pace in the April-to-June quarter. In the first quarter, there was a larger trade deficit than first thought. That ended up shaving a full percentage point from the GDP. Businesses cut back on inventory investment as they tried to make sure unsold stocks of goods didn't get out of whack with customer demand. That lopped off nearly a percentage point to first quarter GDP. Those were the biggest factors behind the government slicing its initial GDP estimate released a month ago by as much as it did. The sour housing market also restrained overall economic activity. Investment in home building was cut by 15.4 percent, on an annualized basis, in the first quarter. However, that wasn't as deep a cut as the 17 percent annualized drop initially estimated. And, it wasn't as severe as the 19.8 percent annualized drop seen in the final quarter of last year. Even so, there is no doubt that troubled housing market is one of the biggest problems for the economy. Although some businesses tightened the belt in the first quarter, consumers did not. That helped to prevent the economy from stalling out altogether. Consumers boosted their spending by a 4.4 percent growth rate in the first quarter, the most in a year. Consumer spending accounts for a major chunk of economic activity. Some economists wonder how much interest consumers will have in continued brisk spending, however, given rising gasoline prices that have topped $3 a gallon in many markets. More money spent filling up the gas tank leaves less to spend on other things. One of the reasons consumers have stayed so resilient even as the housing market has been stuck in a rut for a year is because the job market has been good. Employers &#151; still enjoying profits &#151; are keeping a close watch on spending but they are not drastically clamping down on hiring. Companies profits gained a bit of ground in the first quarter. One measure showed after tax profits rising by 1 percent, up from 0.8 percent in the fourth quarter. An inflation gauge tied to the GDP report and closely watched by the Fed showed that core prices &#151; excluding food and energy &#151; rose at a rate of 2.2 percent in the first quarter. That was unchanged from an initial estimate but up from a 1.8 percent pace in the fourth quarter. The Federal Reserve's key interest rate has been at 5.25 percent for nearly a year. Many economists predict the rate probably will stay right where it is through the rest of this year. Full Coverage: U.S. Economy Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data AP, 15 minutes ago First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Reuters, 38 minutes ago Dollar buying ever less of world's goods The Christian Science Monitor Why Wall Street is worried at The Guardian (UK)., Mar 14 Economic Growth Stalls in First Quarter at The Washington Post U.S. Economic Growth Weakest in Over 4 Years at The New York Times The Upside of Recession? at Newsweek via MSNBC, Apr 24 The scientific way to beat the market at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 22 Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for &#36;6.8B Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data FDA nixes fast track for cancer vaccine First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Wellpoint CFO ousted, violated code of conduct Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 billion Leaner Northwest Airlines exits bankruptcy First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Wal-Mart Report Spells Trouble AM ET Dell to sell &#39;in Wal-Mart&#39; AM ET College Loan Rates to Increase AM ET Traders floored by NYSE change CNN - Wed May 30, 10:05 PM ET Make Money in Growth Stocks. We have a Winner for You. Chase® Home Equity Loan Low rates. No closing costs. No app fee. No annual fees. Apply online. Online Currency Trading - Free Demo 24-Hour trading, award-winning software, charts and more from GFT. GM plant is nation&#39;s most productive Silicon Insider: High Tech Labor Day S&P&#39;s run: A record for a new era Optimists take charge, and summer interns rule. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. &raquo; More from Yahoo! Finance Get the latest news, features and photos.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_eu/russia_putin Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race U.S. has triggered new arms race By VLADIMIR ISACHENKOV, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 59 minutes ago said Thursday that tests of new Russian missiles were a response to the planned deployment of U.S. missile defense installations and other forces in Europe, suggesting Washington has triggered a new arms race. In a clear reference to the United States, he harshly criticized "imperialism" in global affairs and warned that Russia will strengthen its military potential to maintain a global strategic balance. "It wasn't us who initiated a new round of arms race," Putin said when asked about Russia's missile tests at a news conference after talks in the Kremlin with Greek President Karolos Papoulias. Putin described Tuesday's tests of a new ballistic missile capable of carrying multiple nuclear warheads and a new cruise missile as part of the Russian response to the planned deployment of new U.S. military bases and missile defense sites in ex-Soviet satellites in Central and Eastern Europe. He assailed the United States and other members for failing to ratify an amended version of the 1990 Conventional Forces in Europe (CFE) treaty, which limits the deployment of heavy non-nuclear weapons around the continent. "We have signed and ratified the CFE and are fully implementing it. We have pulled out all our heavy weapons from the European part of Russia to (locations) behind the Ural Mountains and cut our military by 300,000 men," Putin said. "And what about our partners? They are filling Eastern Europe with new weapons. A new base in Bulgaria, another one in Romania, a (missile defense) site in Poland and a radar in the Czech Republic," he said. "What we are supposed to do? We can't just sit back and look at that." Putin and other Russian officials have repeatedly rejected U.S. assurances that the planned missile defense installations are meant to counter a potential threat from nations such as and pose no danger to Russia. Putin reaffirmed his warning that Russia would opt out of the CFE treaty altogether if NATO nations fail to ratify its amended version. "Either you ratify the treaty and start observing it, or we will opt out of it," Putin said. In remarks clearly directed against Washington, Putin blasted those "who want to dictate their will to all others regardless of international norms and law." "It's dangerous and harmful," he added. "Norms of the international law were replaced with political expediency. We view it as diktat and imperialism." Russia this week initiated an international conference to be held in Austria in early June to discuss the situation around the CFE treaty. Putin described the tests of new missiles conducted by Russia on Tuesday as a necessary response to the Western action. "There is no reason to fear these actions by Russia, they aren't aggressive. It's merely a response to tough and unfounded unilateral actions by our partners," he said. "These actions are aimed at preserving a global balance." In one missile test Tuesday, a prototype of new Russia's intercontinental ballistic missile, called the RS-24, was fired from a mobile launcher at the Plesetsk launch site in northwestern Russia and its test warhead landed on target 3,400 miles away on the Far Eastern Kamchatka Peninsula, officials said. Russia's military also tested a new cruise missile based on the existing short-range Iskander missile. "We will keep modernizing our potential," Putin said. Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko AFP, 28 minutes ago Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death AP, 1 hour, 39 minutes ago Project born in the Cold War at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 29 Wealth gap leaves rural Russia behind Russia blames US in missile row Suspect Accuses British in Spy's Death at The New York Times Killing the Russian Media at The New York Times at The Economist, Apr 26 Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Hezbollah, Syria denounce U.N. tribunal Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty AP - 1 hour, 1 minute ago hour, 23 minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. Russian President Vladimir Putin, left, speaks at a news conference after a meeting with Greek... Russian President Vladimir Putin News - AP elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/ts_nm/iraq_qaeda_video_dc Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops - Yahoo! News Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops DUBAI (Reuters) - An al Qaeda-led group in signaled in a Web video on Monday that it had killed three U.S. soldiers after capturing them last month, showing only pictures of ID cards of two missing U.S. soldiers. "Fearing the occupying army will continue its searches, harming our Muslim brothers ... (the Islamic State in Iraq) decided to settle the matter and announced the news of their killing to cause bitterness to God&#39;s enemies," said a speaker on the video. "The three soldiers were captives, then dead bodies." The 10-minute video carried a picture of the U.S. Army identification cards of Byron Fouty and Alex Jimenez, with the caption: "(President George W.) Bush is the cause of the loss of your captives." The video, posted on Web sites often used by al Qaeda and other Islamists, did not provide clear evidence that the two were dead. In Baghdad, the U.S. military said it was studying the video. "We are further analyzing the video, however it doesn&#39;t appear to contain any definitive evidence indicating the status of our missing soldiers," Brigadier General Kevin Bergner said in a statement. The U.S. military has carried out an intensive search and found the body of one of the three U.S. soldiers missing after an attack south of Baghdad last month. "As you refuse to hand over the bodies of our killed, we shall not deliver the bodies of your dead," the off-camera speaker said on the video which also showed credit cards and what it said were other belongings of the two soldiers. The U.S. military has said it believed the three had been taken by al Qaeda or others associated with the militant group, after the Islamic State in Iraq group said it was holding the soldiers. The video also showed a group of masked insurgents planning an attack and shaky night footage of what it said was the raid on a U.S. patrol which led to the capture of the three. The insurgent group, formed last year by al Qaeda&#39;s wing in Iraq and several smaller Sunni insurgent groups, has claimed responsibility for mass kidnappings and a series of major attacks. Group claims captured troops were killed Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note denies link to NYC terror plot Most Viewed: Top Stories Insurgent video shows IDs of missing soldiers JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red Taylor boycotts war crimes trial Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws Jun 4, 10:33 AM ET When Good Baseball Managers Go Bad minutes ago U.S. soldiers patrol a village south of Baghdad, May 29, 2007. An al Qaeda-led group... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Al-Qaida & Osama bin Laden &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate The Christian Science Monitor In nouveau riche India, even the poor show off People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/us_nm/angel_dc Illusionist in Times Square cement box stunt - Yahoo! News Illusionist in Times Square cement box stunt Mon Jun 4, 12:53 PM ET NEW YORK (Reuters) - U.S. illusionist Criss Angel began a 24-hour stunt on Monday that will end with him trying to escape from a small cement box strung up above New York&#39;s Times Square before it crashes to the ground. About 100 fans gathered in the rain to watch the spectacle in a parking lot just off Times Square, the same spot where U.S. magician spent two days in November shackled to a gyroscope hoisted in the air before escaping. Angel, 39, sat in a four-foot (1.2 meter) square clear box slowly being encased in cement that was suspended 12 feet above the ground as he spoke to reporters and fans. The box will be lifted to 40 feet later on Monday and Angel will try to escape on Tuesday morning before the box is sent plunging to the ground. "We&#39;re going to stay the whole 24 hours," said Jeremy McLay, a 20-year-old pharmacy worker who traveled three hours from Pennsylvania to watch the stunt. "It&#39;s awesome because it&#39;s never been done. We think he can do it." Angel has been building a career as a magician since he was a teenager in New York but grabbed the spotlight in 2005 when U.S. cable channel A&E began airing his show "Mindfreak." The cement box stunt was to draw attention to the third season of the show, which starts on Tuesday and has included levitation, walking on water, and lying on a bed of nails while an SUV drives over him. "I&#39;m here to do what I have always wanted to do -- try to do the impossible," Angel told Reuters from the box. "Not as a trick, not as an illusion, but as a real life demonstration in the art of escape as Houdini did for his day." "This is really a testament to how I live my life and how I live my career and how I really try to live each moment to the fullest, pushing my own boundaries," he said. A camera inside the box showed Angel&#39;s every move on a big screen and will eventually broadcast his escape attempt. "This guy, he means a lot to me, because he shows if he can believe it, anybody else can believe it," said Jose Mejia, a 19-year-old New York student. "It&#39;s about mind and believing in yourself, you can do anything." Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Women prosecuted for smuggling children Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Vt. secession movement gains traction Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Magician Criss Angel looks out through the glass of a box filling with wet cement... Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://news.yahoo.com/i/1776 Most Viewed News on Yahoo! News Group claims captured troops were killed CAIRO, Egypt - Al-Qaida linked insurgents killed three American soldiers after capturing them last month in Iraq, according to a militant video released Monday that claimed to show footage of the ambush. The video offered no proof for its claims. Purple frog among 24 new species found in Suriname 1 hour, 35 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - A purple fluorescent frog is one of 24 new species found in the South American highlands of Suriname, conservationists reported on Monday, warning that these creatures are threatened by illegal gold mining. Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note 1 hour, 23 minutes ago PRAGUE, Czech Republic - President Bush's European trip was jarred as it began Monday by deteriorating relations with Russia and threatening words from President Vladimir Putin. Ex-Enron executive sentenced to 2 years in prison HOUSTON (Reuters) - The former chief operating officer of Enron Corp.&#39;s broadband Internet division, Kevin Hannon, was sentenced to 2 years in federal prison for his role in the fraud that led to the giant energy company&#39;s collapse, a court official said on Monday. Hilton completes first night in LA jail 1 hour, 14 minutes ago LYNWOOD, Calif. - Paris Hilton completed the first night of her probation sentence as morning arrived Monday in her new surroundings &#151; a Los Angeles County jail cell that will be her home for much of this month. Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Mon Jun 4, 1:11 PM ET WASHINGTON - An indictment charging Rep. William Jefferson, D-La., in a long-running bribery investigation is being announced Monday, federal officials said. Vt. secession movement gains traction 2 hours, 34 minutes ago MONTPELIER, Vt. - At Riverwalk Records, the all-vinyl music store just down the street from the state Capitol, the black "US Out of Vt.!" T-shirts are among the hottest sellers. Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' NEW YORK - Ryan Seacrest is known as a lot of things &#151; slick "American Idol" ringmaster, hotshot radio deejay, ubiquitous E! channel host &#151; but funny guy's not one of them. Which makes his scene-stealing cameo in "Knocked Up" such an amusing surprise. Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops DUBAI (Reuters) - An al Qaeda-led group in Iraq signaled in a Web video on Monday that it had killed three U.S. soldiers after capturing them last month, showing only pictures of ID cards of two missing U.S. soldiers. McCain, Romney clash over immigration CORAL GABLES, Fla. - Republican presidential hopefuls John McCain and Mitt Romney clashed on Monday over the immigration bill, with McCain embracing the measure as a practical solution and Romney dismissing it as unworkable. Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia 2 hours, 50 minutes ago MOGADISHU, Somalia - Ethiopian troops fired Monday at a would-be suicide bomber speeding toward their base, blowing up the car and killing the bomber and a civilian standing nearby, officials said. Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform 1 hour, 55 minutes ago BEIJING - For the first time in 18 years, Ding Zilin marked the anniversary of her son's death with a visit to the place where he was shot amid a violent government crackdown on protests at Tiananmen Square. NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show 1 hour, 21 minutes ago NEW YORK - His job this fall will be to beat "Ugly Betty," but NBC's new entertainment chief is keeping his name on the show. Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe 1 hour, 15 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - U.S. Democratic Rep. William Jefferson was indicted on Monday on 16 criminal counts for conspiring to solicit bribes and pay off a Nigerian official, with $90,000 of an intended bribe found hidden in his home freezer wrapped in aluminum foil. Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Mon Jun 4, 11:57 AM ET NEW YORK - Four men accused of plotting to bomb a fuel pipeline feeding the city's busiest airport were so taken by an informant that they were sure God had sent him to them, authorities said. BAY NAVAL BASE, Cuba - A military judge dismissed terrorism-related charges Monday against a prisoner charged with killing an American soldier in Afghanistan, delivering a blow to the Bush administration's attempt to try Guantanamo detainees in military courts. Women prosecuted for smuggling children PHOENIX - An increasing number of illegal immigrants who left their children back home are hiring complete strangers to bring the youngsters into this country by bluffing their way past U.S. border inspectors. Group denies link to NYC terror plot PORT-OF-SPAIN, Trinidad - The leader of a radical Trinidadian Muslim group denied Monday that his organization had any connection to four men accused of planning to attack New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport. NFL suspends Tank Johnson for 8 games NEW YORK - Tank Johnson of the Chicago Bears was suspended by the NFL for the first eight games of the 2007 regular season for violating the league's new personal conduct policy. Illusionist in Times Square cement box stunt Mon Jun 4, 12:53 PM ET NEW YORK (Reuters) - U.S. illusionist Criss Angel began a 24-hour stunt on Monday that will end with him trying to escape from a small cement box strung up above New York&#39;s Times Square before it crashes to the ground. Scientists find 24 species in Suriname PARAMARIBO Suriname - A frog with fluorescent purple markings and 12 kinds of dung beetles were among two dozen new species discovered in the remote plateaus of eastern Suriname, scientists said Monday. Truex takes first career win at Dover DOVER, Del. - Martin Truex Jr. earned his first career victory for Dale Earnhardt Inc., winning at Dover International Speedway on Monday hours after the death of longtime NASCAR chairman Bill France Jr. Man says he captured Loch Ness on film Fri Jun 1, 5:34 PM ET EDINBURGH, Scotland - The Loch Ness monster is back &#151; and there's video. A man has captured what Nessie watchers say is possible footage of the supposed mythical creature beneath Scotland's most mysterious lake. Palm sells 25 percent stake 1 hour, 1 minute ago SAN JOSE, Calif. - Faced with mounting competition in the smart-phone market, Palm Inc. is selling a quarter of its company to a private equity firm to arm itself with new leadership, most notably the former technical guru behind the iPod. 3 charged in Ill. high school food fight Sun Jun 3, 9:59 PM ET AURORA, Ill. - A high school senior accused of starting a massive food fight that left a police officer injured was among three students arrested in the prank. The New York Times . (AP Photo/SITE Institute) " height="97" width="130" border="0" title="This is an image made from video obtained by the Washington-based ..."/> after the 26-year-old heiress turned herself in to begin her three week stint at the Century Regional Detention Facility. Hours after strolling the red carpet in a strapless black dress, Hilton traded her designer duds for a jail-issued jumpsuit. (AP Photo/Los Angeles County Sherrif)" height="130" width="103" border="0" title="This photo made available Monday, June 4, 2007 by the Los Angeles ..."/> sits in the audience during the MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, Sunday, June 3, 2007. (AP Photo/Kevork Djansezian)" height="130" width="102" border="0" title="Paris Hilton sits in the audience during the MTV Movie Awards ..."/> dressed in a black and white striped jailbird suit is on display on the red carpet at Madame Tussauds New York Monday, June 4, 2007 in New York. The wax figure of Hilton dressed in the jailbird outfit will be on display at the museum in Times Square for the duration of her jail sentence. The 26-year-old heiress checked into the Century Regional Detention Facility in Lynwood, Calif. just after 11:30 p.m. Sunday for violating her probation in an alcohol-related reckless driving case. (AP Photo/Mary Altaffer)" height="130" width="86" border="0" title="A wax figure of Paris Hilton dressed in a black and white striped ..."/> (R) is shown in the back seat of a car with her mother Kathy Hilton in this frame grab from TMZ.com video, as she leaves her parents' home, as she prepares to surrender to Los Angeles County Sheriff's department officials late evening June 3, 2007 in Los Angeles. Earlier in the evening Paris Hilton attended the MTV Movie Awards, posed for photographers and spoke with reporters. Hilton was to begin her jail sentence on or before June 5. (TMZ.COM/Handout/Reuters)" height="97" width="130" border="0" title="Paris Hilton (R) is shown in the back seat of a car with her ..."/> dressed in a black and white striped jailbird suit on display at Madame Tussauds New York Monday, June 4, 2007 in New York. Rogers, a 10th grade teacher, told the wax figure of Hilton 'Sorry, but you got to do your penance, be a role model.' The wax figure of Hilton dressed in the jailbird outfit will be on display at the museum in Times Square for the duration of her jail sentence. The 26-year-old heiress checked into the Century Regional Detention Facility in Lynwood, Calif. just after 11:30 p.m. Sunday for violating her probation in an alcohol-related reckless driving case. (AP Photo/Mary Altaffer)" height="130" width="86" border="0" title="Linda Rogers, from Oxford, Ala., talks to a wax figure of Paris ..."/> arrives at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, June 3, 2007. (Fred Prouser/Reuters)" height="92" width="130" border="0" title="Paris Hilton arrives at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, ..."/> in seen in this booking photo released by Los Angeles County Sheriff's Department. Admitting she was frightened, Hilton traded in her Guccis and designer clothes for jail garb on Sunday night as she began serving a 23-day sentence in Los Angeles for violating probation, her attorney said on June 3, 2007. (Los Angeles County Sheriff's Department/Handout/Reuters)" height="130" width="103" border="0" title="Paris Hilton in seen in this booking photo released by Los Angeles ..."/> poses at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, June 3, 2007. (Phil McCarten/Reuters)" height="130" width="79" border="0" title="Paris Hilton poses at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, ..."/> talks to reporters as she arrives at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, California June 3, 2007. REUTERS/Fred Prouser (UNITED STATES)" height="108" width="130" border="0" title="Paris Hilton talks to reporters as she arrives at the 2007 MTV ..."/> talks to reporters as she arrives at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, California June 3, 2007 file photo. Hilton has begun serving her Los Angeles jail sentence for violating probation, her attorney said on Sunday. REUTERS/Fred Prouser" height="130" width="100" border="0" title="Paris Hilton talks to reporters as she arrives at the 2007 MTV ..."/> talks to reporters as she arrives at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, California June 3, 2007. Hilton has begun serving her Los Angeles jail sentence for violating probation, her attorney said on Sunday. Richard A. Hutton said in a statement that the 26-year-old socialite turned herself in to authorities at a Los Angeles County Jail in the suburb of Lynwood. REUTERS/Fred Prouser (UNITED STATES)" height="130" width="100" border="0" title="REFILE - ADDING NEW CAPTION INFORMATION Paris Hilton talks ..."/> talks to reporters while her handler moves her away as she arrives at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, California June 3, 2007. Hilton has begun serving her Los Angeles jail sentence for violating probation, her attorney said on Sunday. Richard A. Hutton said in a statement that the 26-year-old socialite turned herself in to authorities at a Los Angeles County Jail in the suburb of Lynwood. REUTERS/Fred Prouser (UNITED STATES)" height="93" width="130" border="0" title="REFILE - ADDING NEW CAPTION INFORMATION Paris Hilton talks ..."/> has turned herself in and is now at the Century Regional Detention Center where she is scheduled to serve her prison sentence in Lynwood, Calif. (AP Photo/Gus Ruelas)" height="93" width="130" border="0" title="Sheriff's Department spokes person Stephen Whitmore announces ..."/> hang out backstage during the MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, Sunday, June 3, 2007. (AP Photo/Kevork Djansezian)" height="130" width="87" border="0" title="Fergie, right, and Paris Hilton hang out backstage during the ..."/> in a booking mug after her Sept. 7, 2006 arrest. The photo was released to the media after Hilton was booked into a county jail Sunday night, June 3, 2007 to serve a three-week sentence. After the sheriff's department realized the mix-up, they released a new photo from her June 4 booking. (AP Photo/Los Angeles Police Department)" height="130" width="104" border="0" title="This photo, taken by the Los Angeles Police Department and released ..."/> attends the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, California June 3, 2007. Hilton has begun serving her Los Angeles jail sentence for violating probation, her attorney said on Sunday. Richard A. Hutton said in a statement that the 26-year-old socialite turned herself in to authorities at a Los Angeles County Jail in the suburb of Lynwood. REUTERS/Phil McCarten (UNITED STATES)" height="88" width="130" border="0" title="REFILE - ADDING NEW CAPTION INFORMATION Paris Hilton attends ..."/> has turned herself in and is now at the Century Regional Detention Center where she is scheduled to serve her prison sentence in Lynwood, Calif. (AP Photo/Gus Ruelas)" height="89" width="130" border="0" title="Sheriff's Department spokesperson Stephen Whitmore announces ..."/> arrives at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, California June 3, 2007. REUTERS/Fred Prouser (UNITED STATES)" height="130" width="76" border="0" title="Paris Hilton arrives at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, ..."/> , second left, accompanied by her mother Kathy, left, sitting in the back of an SUV vehicle late Sunday June, 3, 2007 arriving at the Men's Central Jail in downtown Los Angeles to turn herself in. Later, she checked into the Century Regional Detention Facility in Lynwood, Calif. Hilton is expected to serve three-weeks for violating her probation in an alcohol-related reckless driving case. (AP Photo/TMZ.com) " height="97" width="130" border="0" title="This video image released Monday June 4, 2007 by TMZ.Com shows ..."/>
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_la_am_ca/guantanamo_trials Yahoo! News ANDREW O. SELSKY, Associated Press Writer GUANTANAMO BAY NAVAL BASE, Cuba - A military judge dismissed terrorism-related charges Monday against a prisoner charged with killing an American soldier in , delivering a blow to the Bush administration's attempt to try Guantanamo detainees in military courts. The ruling raised questions about whether the U.S. would have to further revise procedures for prosecuting prisoners, leading to major delays. The chief of military defense attorneys at Guantanamo Bay argued that the ruling could spell the end of the war-crimes trial system set up last year by Congress and after the Supreme Court threw out the previous system. But a law professor said it appeared the judge left open the possibility of filing new charges. A military prosecutor said the ruling would be appealed, and the U.S. military entity responsible for holding the military trials said it believed Congress intended to grant jurisdiction to try suspected Taliban and al-Qaida members and supporters. Canadian detainee Omar Khadr, who was 15 when he was captured after a deadly firefight in Afghanistan and who is now 20, will remain at the remote U.S. military base along with some 380 other men suspected of links to al-Qaida and the Taliban. The judge, Army Col. Peter Brownback, said he had no choice but to throw out the Khadr case because he had been classified as an "enemy combatant" by a military panel years earlier &#151; and not as an "alien unlawful enemy combatant." The Military Commissions Act, signed by Bush last year, says only those classified as "unlawful" enemy combatants can face war trials here, Brownback noted during the arraignment in a hilltop courtroom. Later Monday, a lawyer representing the only other detainee charged with war crimes, Salim Ahmed Hamdan, asked another military judge to throw out that case, based on the Khadr ruling. The judge, Navy Capt. Keith Allred, called a recess before the prosecutor could make a statement. Marine Col. Dwight Sullivan, head of the Guantanamo defense attorneys, said the dismissal in the Khadr case would have "huge" impact because none of the detainees held at this isolated military base in southeast Cuba has been found to be an "unlawful" enemy combatant. "It is not just a technicality; it's the latest demonstration that this newest system just does not work," Sullivan told journalists. "It is a system of justice that does not comport with American values." Sullivan said that in order to reclassify the detainees as "unlawful" combatants, the whole review system would have to be overhauled, a time-consuming act. said the issue was little more than semantics. A spokesman said the system was not dealing with lawful combatants, who fight in uniform for a national army. It was set up to determine if a detainee acted as an "unlawful enemy combatant" who was not in an internationally recognized military, did not wear a uniform or rank insignia, did not carry arms openly and was not a party to the Geneva Conventions, he said. "It is our belief that the concept was implicit that all the Guantanamo detainees who were designated as `enemy combatants' ... were in fact unlawful," Navy Cmdr. Jeffrey Gordon told Tobias, a law professor at the University of Richmond, said that because Brownback dismissed the case without prejudice, the U.S. may be able to retry Khadr. He also said it is unclear whether all detainees would have to be reclassified. A military spokeswoman, Army Maj. Beth Kubala, said the prosecution had five days in which to file an appeal. But Sullivan said the court designated to hear any appeal &#151; known as the court of military commissions review &#151; doesn't even exist. Kubala told AP Television News that Brownback's ruling underscored the fairness of the system. "The military commissions procedures and rules are robust and grant significant rights to the accused," she said. The only other Guantanamo detainee currently charged with crimes is Hamdan, who is accused of chauffeuring and being the al-Qaida chief's bodyguard. The third detainee charged under the new system, Australian David Hicks, pleaded guilty in March to providing material support to al-Qaida and is serving a nine-month sentence in Australia. Brownback's ruling came just minutes into Khadr's arraignment on charges he committed murder in violation of the law of war, attempted murder in violation of the law of war, conspiracy, providing material support for terrorism and spying. Khadr allegedly killed a U.S. Army soldier with a grenade in the firefight, in which he was wounded. He appeared in the courtroom with a beard and wearing an olive-green prison uniform. "The charges are dismissed without prejudice," Brownback pronounced as he adjourned the proceeding. A prosecutor, Army Capt. Keith Petty, said he had been prepared to show Khadr was an unlawful combatant because he fought for al-Qaida, and videotapes showed Khadr making and planting explosives targeting American soldiers. Khadr seemed oblivious to the ruling. He calmly watched the judge throw out the case &#151; looking not at Brownback but at a computer screen at the defense table that showed a live TV broadcast of the proceedings. Khadr could see himself on the screen The U.S. military has hoped to accelerate its prosecutions of Guantanamo detainees, with the Pentagon saying it expects to eventually charge about 80 of the 380 prisoners held at this isolated base, but questions lingered about the legitimacy of the process. The Supreme Court, ruling in favor of a lawsuit brought by Hamdan, last June threw out a previous military tribunal system that was set up in the wake of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks, calling it unconstitutional. Congress responded with new guidelines for war-crimes trials and Bush signed them into law. Hamdan's attorney, Navy Lt. Cmdr. Charles Swift, told The Associated Press that he will challenge the new system as unconstitutional. For example, the Military Commissions Act retroactively made certain acts, such as conspiracy a crime, Swift said. "This case raises significant questions" about the separation of powers, Swift said. "Congress cannot violate the Constitution to fix things ... but they are backdating anything and making it a crime." Hamdan is charged with conspiracy &#151; centered on his alleged membership in al-Qaida and purported role in plotting to attack civilians and civilian targets &#151; and with providing material support for terrorism. As part of the second charge, Hamdan is accused of transporting at least one SA-7 surface-to-air missile to shoot down U.S. and coalition military aircraft in Afghanistan in November 2001. The son of an alleged al-Qaida financier, Khadr is accused of killing U.S. Army Sgt. Christopher Speer with a grenade during a firefight in Afghanistan on July 27, 2002. Khadr's attorneys said he was a child soldier and should be rehabilitated, not imprisoned. "The U.S. will be the first country in modern history to try an individual who was a child at the time of the alleged war crimes," the attorneys said in a joint statement in April. Full Coverage: Guantanamo Detainees 25 minutes ago Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials Reuters, 31 minutes ago at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 at The Economist, Mar 30 Guantanamo Canadian case dropped at BBC, Jun 04 Detainee Found Dead in Guantnamo Cell at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 31 at Boston Globe, May 03 Gitmo: still a 'legal black hole' at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 01 Group claims captured troops were killed Group denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia Group denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 40 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. In this courtroom sketch reviewed and cleared for release by U.S. Military officials, Guantanamo detainee... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Latin America Al-Qaida & Osama bin Laden &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_la_am_ca/terrorism_plot_trinidad Group denies link to NYC terror plot - Yahoo! News Group denies link to NYC terror plot By TONY FRASER, Associated Press Writer PORT-OF-SPAIN, Trinidad - The leader of a radical Trinidadian Muslim group denied Monday that his organization had any connection to four men accused of planning to attack New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport. Yasin Abu Bakr, the leader of Jamaat al Muslimeen, told The Associated Press he knew "nothing" about the alleged plan to bomb a fuel pipeline feeding the airport, a plot authorities say was hatched by a group that included a former Guyanese politician. U.S. authorities claim the alleged plotters sought support in Trinidad from Jamaat al Muslimeen, which staged a deadly coup attempt in the Caribbean nation in 1990. The men did not receive such support, according to court documents. But the documents also say that Abdel Nur, a Guyanese suspect thought to be still at large in Trinidad, said he met in May with Abu Bakr at his compound in Trinidad and the Islamic leader suggested that he return later with others involved "to discuss the plan in detail." Nur allegedly said the Jamaat al Muslimeen leader also wanted to do further checks on Russell Defreitas, the 63-year-old accused mastermind of the plot, and an unidentified confidential informant who had infiltrated the group, the documents said. Abu Bakr declined to say if he knew the men, but also denied any involvement. "I know nothing about these men, and I have nothing to do with whatever they are being charged for," he said in his first public comments since U.S. authorities disclosed the plot on Saturday. Two of the suspects &#151; Abdul Kadir, a former member of Guyana's parliament, and Kareem Ibrahim of Trinidad &#151; are in custody in Trinidad. Nur was being sought by Trinidadian authorities. Defreitas, a U.S. citizen native to Guyana and former JFK air cargo employee, was jailed in the United States. Abu Bakr's group, often accused of aiming to create an Islamic state in Trinidad, describes itself simply as a religious organization. The group stormed Parliament and took the prime minister and his Cabinet hostage in a 1990 rebellion that left 24 dead &#151; the only Islamic revolt in the Western Hemisphere. The rebels eventually surrendered and were later pardoned. It is not known to have international reach, although a member was convicted of trying to smuggle 70 assault rifles to Trinidad from Florida in 2005. Abu Bakr faces charges stemming from a 2005 sermon in which he called for war against rich Muslims who refuse to pay zakaat, an Islamic tithe used to alleviate poverty. The following week, he was arrested by police who razed the group's compound and charged him with sedition and incitement to violence. "You know why they are linking me with this so-called plot is to bias the minds of jurors who will be sitting in my case," he said. Separately, a lawyer for the two men held in Trinidad said they would fight extradition to the United States. Ibrahim and Kadir made their initial court appearance Monday for extradition on one count each of conspiracy to commit a terrorist act against the U.S. government. "We will be opposing extradition," said Rajid Persad, a lawyer who represents both men. The judge set another hearing for June 11 to consider bail and scheduled an extradition hearing for Aug. 2. Farid Scoon, another lawyer for the men, said they intend to seek bail. The extradition fight could be a drawn-out affair. Ibrahim and Kadir could appeal all the way to the Privy Council in Britain, the highest court of appeal for the former British territory. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 31 minutes ago Group denies link to NYC terror plot AP, 34 minutes ago One Had Stature and One Didn't, but Neither Seemed an Extremist at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 This terror plot was homegrown at Newsday, Jun 03 Hunt for fourth man in NY airport terror plot at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Terrorists, Chemicals and Trains at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 21 Group claims captured troops were killed Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Trinidadian Kareem Ibrahim, 56, arrives to the Magistrate Court for an extradition hearing in downtown... Drug convict helped bust JFK plot A convicted drug dealer secretly fed information to federal investigators, playing a key role in exposing a terrorism plot against JFK airport. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Latin America &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_as/china_remembering_tiananmen Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform - Yahoo! News Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform By ANITA CHANG, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 55 minutes ago BEIJING - For the first time in 18 years, Ding Zilin marked the anniversary of her son's death with a visit to the place where he was shot amid a violent government crackdown on protests at Tiananmen Square. Police usually are quick to snuff out any memorials in Beijing for those killed in the crackdown that culminated in June 4, 1989, while China's government still calls the seven-week Tiananmen protest a counter-revolutionary riot and has yet to fully disclose what happened. But with China's human rights record under renewed scrutiny ahead of the 2008 Olympics, survivors of the bloody crackdown in Beijing marked the event's 18th anniversary on Monday by demanding political reform. And Ding, who for years was placed under house arrest during Tiananmen anniversaries and other sensitive times, wept on the eve of the anniversary as she placed a photo of her son on the spot where he died a few kilometers west of Tiananmen. "It's been 18 years and I felt like I let him down and let down the others who died with him," she said of her son, who was killed as he hid behind a flower bed from soldiers enforcing martial law on the night of June 3. He had turned 17 the day before. In Hong Kong on Monday &#151; the only place in China where a large, public commemoration is allowed &#151; tens of thousands gathered to mourn the dead at a candlelight vigil. In Beijing's Tiananmen Square, there were no immediate reports of protests and only tourists gathered to watch a daily flag-raising ceremony amid tight security. Ding, co-founder of the Tiananmen Mothers, a group that represents families of those who died, said police did not try to stop her Sunday night, though plainclothes agents may have been observing the vigil. "Right now, this is all I can do. Not getting justice for them, we're still pushing for it but there's been no response," said Ding, who has campaigned to get the government to acknowledge those killed in the crackdown and compensate their families. "Their spirits are obviously not at peace." Most of the surviving students who led the Tiananmen protests have drifted away from activism and into careers in business or other professions, but prominent student leader Wang Dan has continued to push for political reform in China as he pursues a doctorate in history at Harvard University. He said in a videotaped message that China's recent economic success cannot make up for the crackdown and killed hundreds, maybe thousands, of people. "Who can guarantee things that happened 18 years ago will not happen 18 years later?" Wang said. "Even if we become more powerful economically, China still cannot rise in international society." Another former student leader, Wu'er Kaixi, lamented that the memory of Tiananmen appears to be fading worldwide. "The Chinese government is unwilling to face the truth and seems to hope that the 'problem' of June 4 will simply go away," Wu'er, who has worked as a businessman and radio broadcaster in Taiwan, told the most part, the world seems willing to go along with this." In the former British colony of Hong Kong, many residents in 1989 supported the Tiananmen protesters and the violence raised fears that the Communist leadership would not honor its promise to allow Hong Kong the civil liberties its people enjoyed under British rule. But 10 years after the hand-over, the city still enjoys freedoms that people on the mainland can only dream about. Street protests are common and the press frequently criticizes the government, though media watchdogs say self-censorship is common. A candlelight vigil Monday night filled up six soccer fields at Victoria Park near downtown Hong Kong. Amy Chan, 60, brought her 5-year-old granddaughter. "Although she is young, we need to let her know the history," Chan said. Tonny Chin, 50, a clerk, said he has attended the vigil every year since 1989. "The June fourth incident is a tragedy for China," he said. "We need to vindicate it." New York-based Human Rights Watch said Beijing's failure to account for the crackdown casts a pall on its campaign to project a new image ahead of the Olympics in 14 months. "Beijing &#151; and by extension, the 2008 &#151; will remain tarnished by this legacy until the Chinese government provides a complete and truthful account of what happened in June 1989," said Sophie Richardson, deputy Asia director of the human rights group. Associated Press writers Dikky Sinn and William Foreman in Hong Kong and Annie Huang in Taipei, Taiwan, contributed to this report. China won't adopt caps on gas emissions AP, 1 hour, 10 minutes ago Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform AP, 1 hour, 55 minutes ago China, nuclear technology, and a US sale The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, May 30 Can Shanghai turn green and grow? at BBC, May 27 China vows to 'blaze new path to industrialisation' at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 Pollution puts Chinese lake off limits The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Corruption in China: The anger boils over at International Herald Tribune, May 29 U.S. must address risk of untraceable, low-quality food ingredients from China at Pioneer Press, Apr 23 Group claims captured troops were killed denies link to NYC terror plot Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Protesters attend candlelight vigil to mark the crackdown on the Tiananmen Square in Hong Kong... Tiananmen Square anniversary marked with vigil Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Asia News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_mi_ea/missing_soldiers_video Group claims captured troops were killed - Yahoo! News Group claims captured troops were killed By ANNA JOHNSON, Associated Press Writer CAIRO, Egypt - Al-Qaida linked insurgents killed three American soldiers after capturing them last month in , according to a militant video released Monday that claimed to show footage of the ambush. The video offered no proof for its claims. The clip, which was made available to The Associated Press by the Washington-based SITE Institute, showed confused and jerky night battle scenes, and later offered close-ups of two identification cards. It did not show the soldiers. "The Americans sent 4,000 soldiers looking for them," said an unidentified voice on the video, which featured the logo of the media production house of the Islamic State of Iraq. "They were alive and then dead." The body of one of the soldiers was found in Iraq's Euphrates River, but the other two remain missing. Family friends of the missing men said the U.S. military briefed relatives about the video over the weekend. The U.S. military insisted the search for the two missing soldiers would continue. "We condemn the tactics used by these terrorists, and are using all means available to pursue those responsible," said Brig. Gen. Kevin Bergner, the chief military spokesman in Baghdad. "We continue to search and hope that our two missing soldiers will be found alive and in good health. " The video offered no proof for its claims that the soldiers had been killed and buried. The voiceover blamed their deaths on "the American Army and their leaders, who do not care for the feelings of the soldiers' mothers." "And as you refused to deliver the bodies of our killed people, we will not deliver the bodies of your dead, and their end will be beneath the ground, Allah willing," the voice said. A body found May 23 in the Euphrates River was identified by the U.S. military as Pfc. Joseph Anzack Jr., 20, of Torrance, Calif. The missing soldiers have been identified as Spc. Alex R. Jimenez, 25, of Lawrence, Mass., and of Pvt. Byron W. Fouty, 19, of Waterford, Mich. The three vanished after their combat team was ambushed May 12 about 20 miles outside Baghdad. Five others, including an Iraqi, were killed in the ambush, subsequently claimed by al-Qaida. The attack triggered a massive search in the area south of Baghdad known as the "triangle of death" for the rampant insurgent activity there. Gordon Dibler, Fouty's stepfather, said he was holding out hope for the soldiers' safe return: "We're praying, and so far, we don't know for certain that they aren't alive." At the end of the 10-minute 41-second video, the identification cards of the two missing soldiers were shown, with the headline: "Bush is the reason of the loss of your POWs" written on the screen above the cards. SITE, an organization that monitors terrorist groups, did not say how it obtained the video. A card belonging to Anzack was not shown. Along with the identification cards, the footage also showed credit cards, American and Iraqi money and other personal items the militants called "booty." Bergner, the U.S. spokesman, said the footage "doesn't appear to contain any definitive evidence indicating the status of our missing soldiers." The video also showed footage, apparently taken before the ambush, of three masked men standing around a stand displaying a sketch of the area, mapping out the attack plan. One of the three men, who were all dressed in black, talked to the camera and pointed to the sketch. Another stood by him carrying a gun. "I have urged you to bring me American prisoners," said the man, whose name was not given but was identified as one of the militant group's leaders. A Islamic Web site that commonly posts videos from militant groups including the Islamic State of Iraq said in a banner headline that it would show the video within hours, but the video has not yet appeared. After the soldiers disappeared, the Islamic State of Iraq issued Web statements warning the Americans to call off the hunt "if you want their safety." Associated Press writer David N. Goodman contributed to this report from Detroit. Full Coverage: U.S. Armed Forces China&#39;s military must be more transparent: Pace AFP, Mon Jun 4, 9:36 AM ET US military analysis says troop &#39;surge&#39; in Iraq short of goal AFP, Mon Jun 4, 1:29 AM ET Lessons from the Great War at The Chicago Tribune (reg. req'd), May 28 Another Memorial Day Marks Grief's Journey at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 28 2 Marines Deny Suspecting Haditha War Crime at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 31 Record Turnout Marks Rolling Thunder Ride's 20th Anniversary at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 28 Memorial Day is a chance to reflect Blame politicians, not those fighting at L.A. Daily News, May 28 denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. This is an image made from video obtained by the Washington-based SITE Institute showing the... Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead A new militant video claims that three U.S. soldiers captured after an ambush are dead; one soldier&#39;s body has been found, but the U.S. military says it will continue to search for the two others. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video Soldiers&#39; ID cards online The military ID cards of two soldiers missing in Iraq have appeared on an Islamic web site. CNN&#39;s Barbara Starr reports. &raquo; More CNN video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Middle East News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/vermont_secession Vt. secession movement gains traction - Yahoo! News Vt. secession movement gains traction By JOHN CURRAN, Associated Press Writer 2 hours, 34 minutes ago MONTPELIER, Vt. - At Riverwalk Records, the all-vinyl music store just down the street from the state Capitol, the black "US Out of Vt.!" T-shirts are among the hottest sellers. But to some people in Vermont, the idea is bigger than a $20 novelty. They want Vermont to secede from the United States &#151; peacefully, of course. Disillusioned by what they call an empire about to fall, a small cadre of writers and academics hopes to put the question before citizens in March. Eventually, they want to persuade state lawmakers to declare independence, returning Vermont to the status it held from 1777 to 1791. Neither the state nor the U.S. Constitution explicitly forbids secession, but few people think it is politically viable. "I always thought the Civil War settled that," said Russell Wheeler, a constitutional law expert at the Brookings Institution in Washington, D.C. If Vermont fought and won a war with the federal government, "then you could say Vermont proved the point. But that's not going to happen." Still, the idea has found plenty of sympathetic ears in Vermont, a left-leaning state that said yes to civil unions, no to slavery (before any other) and last year elected a socialist to the U.S. Senate. Supporters have published a "Green Mountain Manifesto" subtitled "Why and How Tiny Vermont Might Help Save America From Itself by Seceding from the Union." In 2005, about 300 people turned out for a secession convention in the Statehouse, and plans for a second one are in the works. A poll this year by the University of Vermont's Center for Rural Studies found that 13 percent of those surveyed support secession, up from 8 percent a year before. "The argument for secession is that the U.S. has become an empire that is essentially ungovernable &#151; it's too big, it's too corrupt and it no longer serves the needs of its citizens," said Rob Williams, editor of Vermont Commons, a quarterly newspaper dedicated to secession. "We have electoral fraud, rampant corporate corruption, a culture of militarism and war," Williams said. "If you care about democracy and self-governance and any kind of representative system, the only constitutional way to preserve what's left of the Republic is to peaceably take apart the empire." Vermont, which was historically conservative, has evolved into one of the nation's most liberal states since the latter part of the 20th century, a tie-dyed bastion of countercultural dissent and New England self-reliance where folks wear their hearts &#151; and their anti-war stickers &#151; on their Subaru station wagon bumpers. Secession movements have a long history. Key West, Fla., staged a mock secession from America in the 1980s. In Vermont, the town of Killington tried to break away and join New Hampshire in 2004, and Hawaii, Alaska, New Hampshire, South Carolina, and Texas all have some form of secession organizations today. The Vermont movement has been simmering for years but gained new traction because of the war, rising oil prices and the formation of several pro-secession groups. Secession supporters hope to have the question considered in March on Town Meeting Day, when voters gather to discuss state and local issues. Thomas Naylor, 70, a retired Duke University economics professor and author, wrote the manifesto and founded a secession group called Second Vermont Republic. His 112-page manifesto contains little explanation of how Vermont would make do without federal aid for security, education and social programs. Some in the movement foresee a Vermont with its own currency and passports, for example, and some form of representative government formed once the secession has taken place. Frank Bryan, a professor at the University of Vermont who has championed the cause for years, said the cachet of secession would make the new republic a magnet. "People would obviously relish coming to the Republic of Vermont, the Switzerland of North America," he said. "Christ, you couldn't keep them away." The Middlebury Institute, a Cold Spring, N.Y., think tank, hosted a North American Separatist Convention last fall in Burlington that drew representatives from 16 organizations. The group is co-sponsoring another conference in October in Chattanooga, Tenn. Of course, skeptics abound. "It doesn't make economic sense, it doesn't make political sense, it doesn't make historical sense. Other than that, it's a good idea," said Paul Gillies, a lawyer and Vermont historian. For now, the would-be secessionists are hoping to draw enough support to get the question on Town Meeting Day agendas. "We're normal human beings," said Williams, 39, a history professor at Champlain College. "But we're serious about this. We want people in Vermont to think about the options going forward. Do you want to stay in an empire that's in deep trouble?" Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Women prosecuted for smuggling children Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Women prosecuted for smuggling children Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/smuggling_children Women prosecuted for smuggling children - Yahoo! News Women prosecuted for smuggling children By AMANDA LEE MYERS, Associated Press Writer PHOENIX - An increasing number of illegal immigrants who left their children back home are hiring complete strangers to bring the youngsters into this country by bluffing their way past U.S. border inspectors. Typically, the stranger poses as the child's mother or another relative as she drives through a checkpoint. Sometimes the children are given cough syrup to sedate them and ensure they don't say or do anything to make border guards suspicious. U.S. officials say they are seeing more such cases because stepped-up enforcement along the border has made it more dangerous to sneak into the country by trekking across the desert. "People who may be afraid or think it's too dangerous to bring a child through the desert when it's 120 degrees think it's better to place a child in the hands of a total stranger," said Roger Maier, a U.S. Customs and Border Protection spokesman in Texas. U.S. officials warned that entrusting children to a stranger is foolish, too. "There's no guarantee that you're going to be reunited with your child. There's no guarantee that your child is being cared for," said Brian Levin, a U.S. Customs and Border Protection spokesman in Arizona. Nevertheless, officials at the border could not cite a specific case of a child being hurt or stolen in the smuggling scheme. Dozens of U.S. citizens, permanent residents and other women with a legal right to be in this country have been prosecuted in the past few years for trying to smuggle children into the U.S. Border officials said they do not have exact numbers but believe such cases are on the rise. The women are typically poor, and are hired by smugglers for $100 to $500 for the transaction. They are often mothers themselves, and use their own children's birth certificates when they drive through a checkpoint. "They're a vulnerable class of people who get sucked into this," said Joel Parris, an assistant federal public defender in Tucson who has defended several women smugglers. "These women are so focused on surviving and taking care of their own kids, when someone comes with a pity trip, their sympathy is so strong they can't resist." Ana Meza-Montano, a 36-year-old single mother from Agua Prieta, Mexico, across the border from Douglas, Ariz., had a border crossing card that allowed her to enter the United States for short periods to shop and run other errands. Meza-Montano was caught at the Douglas port of entry trying to smuggle a 1-year-old girl who she said was her daughter. Parris, who defended her, said Meza-Montano agreed to the transaction because a smuggler offered to pay off her son's $100 bicycle, which was on layaway at a Wal-Mart. The woman is serving a 15-month prison sentence. Sandra Ramirez, a 24-year-old single mother of four, was caught trying to sneak an 11-year-old boy through the Nogales, Ariz., port of entry, and said a co-worker offered her $1,000 to do it. Now Ramirez is serving a 15-month prison sentence and will be deported to Mexico after she gets out. "This is just one of the most overwhelmingly saddest cases," said Ramirez's lawyer, Stephanie Meade. "She had no idea of the kind of consequences and trouble that she would get in." Officials say the smuggling tactic has become more common partly because more illegal immigrants are deciding to bring their families into the country. In the past, it was more common for men to leave their families behind and return periodically for visits. Also, because of tighter enforcement by the Border Patrol and the National Guard, illegal immigrants who want to sneak across the desert are being forced to make the attempt along more remote, more rugged &#151; and more dangerous &#151; stretches of the border. The U.S. Attorney's Office in Arizona has made prosecuting these child-smuggling cases one of its top priorities. "Children are being put in situations where the risk of something happening to them is high, and we felt that people need to be held accountable for this," spokesman Wyn Hornbuckle said. He added: "There are many examples of how violent these smuggling organizations are and how ruthless they've become, and they'd be the last people I'd entrust my kids to." U.S. Customs and Border Protection: Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Anti-war Marine blasts military Vt. secession movement gains traction Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Attorney Stephanie Meade, shown in her office in Tucson, Ariz., Wednesday, May 30, 2007, represents... Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_el_pr/republicans_immigration McCain, Romney clash over immigration - Yahoo! News McCain, Romney clash over immigration By BRENDAN FARRINGTON, Associated Press Writer CORAL GABLES, Fla. - Republican presidential hopefuls John McCain ( ) and Mitt Romney clashed on Monday over the immigration bill, with McCain embracing the measure as a practical solution and Romney dismissing it as unworkable. Speaking in politically crucial Florida, with its heavy concentration of Cuban and Haitian immigrants, McCain argued that while the bill is imperfect, it is an attempt to secure U.S. borders, help the economy and identify those who have entered the nation illegally. The four-term Arizona senator chided rivals who are trying to score points on the issue. McCain never mentioned any names but his target was obvious &#151; Romney. "To want the office so badly that you would intentionally make our country's problems worse might prove you can read a poll or take a cheap shot, but it hardly demonstrates presidential leadership," McCain told members of the Greater Miami Chamber of Commerce. "The immigration approach proposed by Senators McCain and Kennedy falls short of a workable solution to an important problem," the former Massachusetts governor said in a statement. Romney said he respected McCain, but his opposition was based on a "principled disagreement about policies and priorities related to enforcement of our immigration laws." The immigration measure would tighten security on the Mexican border while allowing some of the 12 million illegal immigrants a chance to stay in the United States and eventually become citizens. has spoken out in favor of the bipartisan bill. Romney did not mention the president, instead describing the immigration approach of McCain and liberal icon Kennedy. McCain said Bush understands the political implications. "The president knows. He spent eight years as governor of Texas," McCain told The Associated Press after his speech. "The Republican Party must address this issue, if, in my part of the country, we expect to attract Hispanic voters." McCain stands alone among the major candidates in supporting the bill. He has criticized Romney for opposing the measure based on provisions that would provide a path to legalization. "I will never conduct my campaign in such a way that it makes our country's most difficult challenges harder to solve. I hope you will hold all candidates to that same standard. Pandering for votes on this issue, while offering no solution to the problem, amounts to doing nothing. And doing nothing is silent amnesty," McCain said to loud applause. Another GOP rival, former New York city Mayor Rudy Giuliani, also opposes the bill, but has said he is willing to compromise on how to deal with the estimated 12 million illegal immigrants in the United States as long as he is satisfied all security issues are addressed. Romney has not offered a detailed plan on how he would handle illegal immigrants, but he said recently a priority would be to deport criminals and remove illegal immigrants from government assistance programs. Romney's response to the bill has varied with his audience. Most of his criticism has focused on the so-called Z-visa, a document proposed for registering the estimated 12 million illegal aliens in the country. Last month in South Carolina, home to the type of social conservatives Romney is courting, he said, "I think we should not call it the 'Z' visa; we should call it the 'A' visa, because it's amnesty and that's what it stands for." Yet a week later in Florida, he said, "There are some who get involved in whether it is technically amnesty or not and I'm not really trying to define what is technically amnesty. I'll let the lawyers do that." Despite his amnesty complaints, Romney said he would not favor rounding up the illegal immigrants already in the country. Rather, he supports them self-reporting to immigration authorities. McCain chose a supportive crowd to deliver his 25-minute address Monday. Many of the Miami area's business leaders are immigrants or children of immigrants. He was given an extended ovation before beginning his speech and his remarks were interrupted several times by applause. "Florida is a living testament to the benefits of immigration, a great and prosperous state built in large part by immigrants who came here to escape tyranny and despair," he said. Full Coverage: Presidential Election 2008 McCain, Romney clash over immigration AP, 41 minutes ago Huckabee: Thompson buzz like cartoon AP, 51 minutes ago Clinton borrows page from husband's playbook at Boston Globe, Jun 04 Democrat rivals try to make their mark at BBC, Jun 04 On Romney's bus in Iowa, seats are free at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Democratic candidates clash over Iraq at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 A night for Obama and Biden at Boston Globe, Jun 04 Iraq takes all the oxygen at Boston Globe, Jun 04 Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race cuts back climate checks from space Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey U.S. cuts back climate checks from space minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Sen. John McCain responds to media questions following a speech in support of the an... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Politics - Republican Party &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/bs_nm/enron_sentencing_dc Ex-Enron executive sentenced to 2 years in prison - Yahoo! News Ex-Enron executive sentenced to 2 years in prison HOUSTON (Reuters) - The former chief operating officer of Enron Corp.&#39;s broadband Internet division, Kevin Hannon, was sentenced to 2 years in federal prison for his role in the fraud that led to the giant energy company&#39;s collapse, a court official said on Monday. Hannon, 46, also received a &#36;125,000 fine from U.S. District Judge Vanessa Gilmore in Houston, a clerk for the judge said. Hannon, who was COO of Enron Broadband Services from January 2000 to June 2001, pleaded guilty in August 2004 to one count of conspiracy to commit wire and securities fraud and agreed to cooperate with prosecutors at the bankrupt company. The former Internet executive, who testified for the prosecution at the criminal trial of his former bosses Kenneth Lay and Jeffrey Skilling in March 2006, had faced up to five years in prison. At the time of his plea, Hannon also agreed to forfeit &#36;2.2 million and pay &#36;1 million to settle U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission Securities and Exchange Commission Hannon initially was indicted on charges of conspiracy, money laundering and insider trading, In March 2003, Hannon and six other managers were charged in a 221-count indictment of hiding poor results in the broadband unit, which was once touted as one of Enron&#39;s brightest prospects. Hannon&#39;s lawyer was not immediately available for comment on the sentence. Enron, once the seventh-largest U.S. company, collapsed into bankruptcy in December 2001 after its use of off-balance-sheet financing to prop up its results and hide massive debts was revealed. Lay and Skilling were convicted in May 2006 for their roles in the fraud that triggered the collapse of Enron. Skilling is serving a 24-year sentence in prison in Minnesota. Lay died of a heart attack in July 2006 and never served time in prison. Judge says Enron suit can proceed Reuters via Yahoo! News, Feb 22 Law firm's Enron settlement is $18.5 million at Houston Chronicle, Jan 19 Attorneys seek to drop 5 Enron defendants at Houston Chronicle, Jan 10 Skilling reports to prison at Houston Chronicle, Dec 13 Time runs out Dec. 12 for Skilling's freedom at Houston Chronicle, Dec 03 Man writes children's book about the collapse of Enron at Houston Chronicle, Nov 16 Enron's last victim: American markets at International Herald Tribune, Jan 04 A fitting place for Skilling at Houston Chronicle, Dec 13 Stocks eke out gain despite China drop Factory orders post weak advance Palm sells 25 percent stake Krispy Kreme widens 1Q losses Hyundai grabs lead in auto quality study 'Piggybacking' roils credit industry Oil at $70 as cyclone nears Mideast Gulf Krispy Kreme widens 1Q losses Loews bets on natural gas in $4 billion Dominion deal Stocks eke out gain despite China drop Middle-class America in peril CNN - Mon Jun 4, 1:37 PM ET Life after work: Sharing a legacy CNN - Fri Jun 1, 8:06 PM ET Save Money on Airfare! Jun 1, 7:38 PM ET May: a Great Month for Jobs Jun 1, 6:03 PM ET First 3 Months at 1/2 price. Free Domain Name & Setup. 24/7 Support. Chase® Home Equity Loan Low rates. No closing costs. No app fee. No annual fees. Apply online. Online Currency Trading - Free Demo 24-Hour trading, award-winning software, charts and more from GFT. Kevin P. Hannon, former chief operating officer for Enron Corp.'s broadband unit, arrives at Houston's... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Corporate Fraud & Scandals &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Securities and Exchange Commission Elsewhere on the Web Spotlight on cancer: Drugs, new studies China Goes Decadent With &#39;Millionaire Fair&#39; Dow Jones owners seen on the defensive Investors get nervous in China, and Murdoch makes nice. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. &raquo; More from Yahoo! Finance Get the latest news, features and photos. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/pl_nm/usa_crime_congressman_dc Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe - Yahoo! News Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe 1 hour, 16 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - U.S. Democratic Rep. William Jefferson ( ) was indicted on Monday on 16 criminal counts for conspiring to solicit bribes and pay off a Nigerian official, with &#36;90,000 of an intended bribe found hidden in his home freezer wrapped in aluminum foil. The 94-page indictment also charges the Louisiana lawmaker with racketeering, soliciting bribes for himself and his family, fraud, money laundering, obstruction of justice, conspiracy and violating the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act. Jefferson, 63, a member of Congress since 1991 whose district includes New Orleans, faces a maximum of 235 years in prison if convicted. He has denied any wrongdoing. The investigation has centered on whether Jefferson used his position to promote the sale of telecommunications equipment and services offered by a Louisville-based firm to Nigeria, Ghana, and possibly other African nations in return for stock and cash payments. Jefferson won re-election to a ninth term in Congress in November, when voters shrugged off the federal bribery investigation. The indictment provided some new details about the lengthy probe, including commentary from a witness cooperating with the on July 30, 2005, who gave Jefferson &#36;100,000 in cash that was intended as a bribe to the unnamed Nigerian official. It said Jefferson put in his home freezer &#36;90,000 of the cash, which was separated in &#36;10,000 amounts, wrapped in aluminum foil and concealed inside various frozen food containers. Jefferson instructed the bribes to be funneled through companies controlled by staffers and relatives. "I&#39;m in the shadows behind the curtain somewhere," the indictment quoted him as saying. In November, Democrats won control of the U.S. Congress from Bush&#39;s Republicans, promising to end a "culture of corruption." Most of the scandals that have rocked Capitol Hill in recent years involved Republicans, many of them briberies tied to now-convicted lobbyist Jack Abramoff. Former Republican Rep. Bob Ney of Ohio pleaded guilty last year in the Abramoff scandal. In a separate case, former California Rep. Randy Cunningham pleaded guilty to bribery charges. Two former associates of Jefferson have pleaded guilty to bribery charges and have been cooperating in the investigation, which also included an unprecedented search by FBI agents of his congressional office last year. The indictment says the bribery conspiracy began in 2001. It said the purpose of the conspiracy was "to provide for the unjust enrichment of defendant Jefferson and his family members by corruptly seeking, soliciting and directing that things of value be paid to him and his family members in return for ... Jefferson&#39;s performance of official acts." Meredith McGehee, policy director for the Campaign Legal Center, an ethics watchdog group, said Jefferson&#39;s indictment should serve as a clarion call for Congress to follow through on its promise to "drain the swamp." (additional reporting by Thomas Ferraro and Andy Sullivan) Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Romney clash over immigration Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey McCain, Romney clash over immigration U.S. cuts back climate checks from space minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Congressman William Jefferson (D-LA) speaks to reporters after arriving at Reagan National Airport in Washington,... Rep. William Jefferson Indicted Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_en_tv/paris_hilton Hilton completes first night in LA jail - Yahoo! News Hilton completes first night in LA jail By AMANDA BECK, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 15 minutes ago completed the first night of her probation sentence as morning arrived Monday in her new surroundings &#151; a Los Angeles County jail cell that will be her home for much of this month. The 26-year-old hotel heiress worked the red carpet at the MTV Movie Awards on Sunday afternoon, then traded her strapless designer gown for a jail-issue jumpsuit and a solitary cell. Hilton entered the Century Regional Detention Facility in Lynwood just after 11:30 p.m. to serve 23 days for violating her probation in an alcohol-related reckless driving case. She is due out on June 26. "It's hell. Go to jail and you'll find out," Alicia Singleton, 23, of Oakland, said Monday as she left jail after serving five weeks for a crime she refused to describe. Singleton said she and other inmates were asleep when Hilton checked in. Around 7 a.m., they learned Hilton was there when they watched the TV news. To most of them, it was no big deal. "Oh, Paris, Paris, Paris. If you do the crime you've got to do the time," Singleton said. Hilton surrendered after a surprise visit to the MTV awards. "I am trying to be strong right now," she told reporters on the red carpet. "I'm ready to face my sentence. Even though this is a really hard time, I have my family, my friends and my fans to support me, and that's really helpful." Sheriff's spokesman Steve Whitmore said Hilton was easy to work with. "Her demeanor was helpful. She was focused, she was cooperative," he said. Hilton, accompanied by her mother, Kathy Hilton, surrendered at the Men's Central Jail in downtown Los Angeles just after 10:30 p.m. She was then escorted to the women's facility in Lynwood, where she was booked, fingerprinted, photographed, medically screened and issued an orange top and pants, Whitmore said. Hilton's booking photo shows her wearing what appeared to be a V-neck shirt, eye makeup and lip gloss that highlighted a slight smile. Her blond hair was draped over one shoulder. Sheriff's deputies had released a mug shot taken last year after Hilton was arrested by Los Angeles police. That photo showed her smiling, in full makeup and with her head tilted to the left, with her blond hair flowing over her bare shoulders. The mistake was made because the sheriff's department and LAPD mug shots are in the same database, Whitmore said. "It was an inadvertent release." Hilton, star of the TV reality series "The Simple Life," is being housed in the "special needs" unit of the 13-year-old jail, separate from most of its 2,200 inmates. The unit contains 12 two-person cells reserved for police officers, public officials, celebrities and other high-profile inmates. Hilton's cell has two bunks, a table, a sink, a toilet and a small window. She does not have a cellmate. Like other inmates in that unit, Hilton will take her meals in her cell and will be allowed outside the 12-by-8-foot space for at least an hour each day to shower, watch TV in the day room, participate in outdoor recreation or talk on the telephone. No cell phones or BlackBerrys are permitted in the facility, even for visitors. It will be pretty stark for her, but it will be a step up from the general population. Teresa Jones, 50, of Lancaster, who wasn't clear about what she served time for, called the jail "so filthy it's worse than skid row." At check-in, jailers hand out a pamphlet on infections, which are common, she said. "That place is hell, it's awful. Life is easy compared to this," Jones said. The jail, a two-story concrete building next to train tracks and beneath a bustling freeway, has been an all-female facility since March 2006. It's located in an industrial area about 12 miles southeast of downtown Los Angeles. When Hilton was sentenced May 4, the judge ruled that she would not be allowed any work release, furloughs or use of an alternative jail or electronic monitoring in lieu of jail. Hilton's publicist, Elliot Mintz, said he spoke with Kathy Hilton after she returned from the jail. "She told me it was very emotional," Mintz said. "She also said that she feels this will be a time when Paris will be able to think and reflect and to spend time alone to learn from the experience because in Paris' life she's never alone &#151; there's always a constant chatter around her." Officers arrested Hilton in Hollywood on Sept. 7. In January, she pleaded no contest to the reckless-driving charge and was sentenced to 36 months' probation, alcohol education and $1,500 in fines. She was pulled over by California Highway Patrol on Jan. 15. Officers informed Hilton she was driving on a suspended license and she signed a document acknowledging she was not to drive. She then was pulled over by sheriff's deputies on Feb. 27, at which time she was charged with violating her probation. Full Coverage: Celebrity Crime Paris Hilton starts jail sentence at BBC, Jun 04 DA: Tom Sizemore should go to prison AP via Yahoo! News, May 25 Evidence hidden in Spector trial at BBC, May 24 Actor Garrison pleads guilty in drink driving death Reuters via Yahoo! News, May 21 Unfazed by his judgment of Paris at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 08 Spector trial renews debate on TV in courtroom at San Francisco Chronicle, Apr 25 Commentary: Media circus at the Spector trial at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 01 Go (away) O.J., go at San Francisco Chronicle, Nov 21 Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show Hilton completes first night in LA jail Appeals court hands broadcasters a win Spoleto festival to honor Menotti NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show As `Sopranos' end nears, so does Tony's Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' LEAKING FAUCETS ARE TORTURE FOR WIFE MARRIED TO BIG DRIP Appeals court hands broadcasters a win Web Extra: Paris Hilton Statue Gets Jail Suit WCCO Minneapolis - 46 minutes ago A Very Simple Life: Paris Hilton Checks Into Jail CBS 2 / KCAL 9 Los Angeles - 1 hour, 48 minutes ago Check out highlights from the MTV Movie Awards AP minutes ago Paris Hilton gets no respect from fellow celebs AP minutes ago Mountain Dew® Transform Your Summer Transformers Movie Sweepstakes. Protect. Destroy. July 4, 2007. The Police 28 Classic Tracks - 2Cd Set The Police's 30th anniversary 2CD set features 28 classic tracks. Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. This video image released Monday June 4, 2007 by TMZ.Com shows hotel heiress Paris Hilton,... Paris Already Unpopular With Prison Inmates Prison staff says the celebutante will not get special treatment. Eileen Gonzales reports. &raquo; More CBS 2 / KCAL 9 Los Angeles video Paris Hilton reports to LA county jail Paris Hilton checked into a Los Angeles County jail late Sunday to begin a three-week stay for violating her probation in an alcohol-related reckless driving case. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Gossip/Celebrity News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Living in a porn-driven, &#39;look-at-me&#39; culture Send Joel Siegel Your Movie Reviews and Watch to See If You Make the Cut! Oh, what a night for the first live MTV set Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_af/somalia Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia - Yahoo! News Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia By SALAD DUHUL, Associated Press Writer 2 hours, 50 minutes ago MOGADISHU, Somalia - Ethiopian troops fired Monday at a would-be suicide bomber speeding toward their base, blowing up the car and killing the bomber and a civilian standing nearby, officials said. "This was a terrorist act," Deputy Defense Minister Salad Ali Jelle said. The attack came one day after a suicide car bomber drove through a roadblock guarding the prime minister's home and rammed the vehicle into a wall, killing seven people. The prime minister was unharmed. The violence in the Somali capital of Mogadishu has undermined the government's claims to have defeated Islamic insurgents who have promised an -style guerrilla war. The battles have pitted the government and Ethiopian troops propping it up against clan rivals and Islamic insurgents. Prime Minister Ali Mohamed Gedi said Monday that the attack targeting him over the weekend was meant to disrupt a peace and reconciliation conference planned for later this month. "The whole objective of the insurgents or the terrorists is to stop or delay the national reconciliation conference. We will not do it. We will continue," Gedi said outside his home, which was damaged in Sunday's blast. "We will try to pacify the capital city before the conference." Jelle has blamed the attack on "terrorists linked to al-Qaida." Germany, which holds the presidency, issued a statement Monday condemning the attack on the prime minister "as an assault on the whole peace and reconciliation process in Somalia" and saying a Somali working for the was among those killed. Sunday's attack was at least the third attempt on Gedi's life since he returned to Somalia in May 2005. No one has claimed responsibility for the attacks. Meanwhile, Somali pirates who hijacked a Taiwan-flagged fishing vessel in mid-May off this country's lawless coast killed one of the 16 crew members because the ship's owners have not paid a ransom, a maritime official said Monday. The pirates threatened to kill other crew members if their demands are not met, said Andrew Mwangura, head of the Kenyan chapter of the Seafarers Assistance Program. He cited a relative of one of the captives, who was allowed to call his family. "The gunmen have established contact with the owner of the ship but it appears that he was giving them empty promises," Mwangura said. The ship &#151; Ching Fong Hwa 168 &#151; had two Taiwanese and 12 Chinese crew members on board when it was hijacked 137 miles northeast of Mogadishu. Somalia does not have a coast guard or navy after more than a decade of anarchy. The current government was formed in 2004 but has struggled to assert any real control throughout the country. Although piracy is rampant off Somalia's lawless coast, killing crew members is relatively rare, Mwangura said. He said pirates have killed four crew members in the past 10 years. Associated Press writers Mohamed Olad Hassan in Mogadishu and Malkhadir M. Muhumed in Nairobi, Kenya, contributed to this report. Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia AP, 2 hours, 50 minutes ago Islamist militants claim suicide attack on Somali PM Reuters, Mon Jun 4, 12:57 PM ET Somali pop stars take on tradition at BBC, May 18 Mogadishu seeks a makeover at BBC, May 14 Briton 'killed in US missile attack in Somalia' at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 Pirates 'kill' hostage in Somalia at BBC, Jun 04 Arab League Has Role in Somalia Peace Deal at allAfrica.com, Mar 30 Only Bold Action in Somalia Will Put End to the Chaos at allAfrica.com, Mar 30 Group claims captured troops were killed denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Group claims captured troops were killed denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Ethiopian troops patrol the street of Mogadishu, Somalia, Monday June 4, 2007. Somalia's prime minister... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Africa &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_go_pr_wh/bush Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note - Yahoo! News Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note By TERENCE HUNT, AP White House Correspondent 1 hour, 24 minutes ago PRAGUE, Czech Republic - 's European trip was jarred as it began Monday by deteriorating relations with Russia and threatening words from President Bush and Putin will see each other at the annual summit of industrialized nations, beginning Wednesday at the Baltic Sea resort city of Heiligendamm, Germany. In a diplomatic poke in the eye at Putin, Bush bracketed the summit with stops in the Czech Republic and Poland &#151; the two countries where the United States wants to build a missile defense system for Europe. Already complaining of being encircled by 's expansion, Putin said putting missile defenses on Russia's doorstep would ignite a new arms race. He threatened to retarget Russia's missiles toward Europe. Bush says the anti-missile program is intended to protect Europe from states like , but Putin said neither country possesses the rockets the American system is intended to shoot down. "It's a defense against something which does not exist," the Russian president said. "It would be funny if it was not so sad." Flying to Europe with Bush, National Security Adviser Steve Hadley reacted cautiously to Putin. "There has been some escalation in the rhetoric," he said. "We think that is not helpful. We would like to have a constructive dialogue with Russia on this issue. We have in the past." urged Putin to cool down. "This isn't the Soviet Union and we need to drop the rhetoric that sounds like what the United States and the Soviet Union used to say about each other and realize it is the United States and Russia in a very different period," Rice said on the way to an Organization of American States meeting in Panama City, Panama. "It doesn't really help anybody to start threatening the Europeans," she said. "You cannot launch a threat at Europe that is separable from the United States." Bush and his wife, Laura, arrived late Monday evening. In his only address of an eight-day trip through six countries, Bush will make a speech on Tuesday about supporting global democratic aspirations. Hadley said Russia, accused of backpedaling on democracy, would come up in that speech because "there are no exceptions to the freedom agenda." "So obviously when we look for the progress of freedom and democracy we look for the progress of freedom and democracy in Russia and China," Hadley said. Putin's sharp words at Washington &#151; and Britain, as well &#151; set an unusually chilly tone for the three-day summit in Heiligendamm. Leaders of the eight participating countries &#151; the United States, Britain, Russia, France, Germany, Italy, Canada and Japan &#151; typically mask their differences in statements that have been watered down to find consensus. "The most interesting issue on the agenda, to me, is Russia and how the other seven will handle Mr. Putin, who is really the elephant in the room," said Simon Serfaty, a senior adviser to the Europe program at the Center for Strategic and International Studies. Aside from his sharp words at Washington, Putin also took a slap at Britain for seeking the extradition of a Russian businessman who is a suspect in the killing of former KGB agent Alexander Litvinenko. Putin called London's move "stupidity." German Chancellor Angela Merkel also had a run-in with Putin last month, criticizing Russia's crackdown on political opponents. In interviews before the trip, Bush called Putin "my friend" but said the U.S.-Russian relationship was complicated. "Vladimir Putin will tell me that Russia is a democracy and that he's advancing democracy," Bush said. "We have got some questions about that, of course." There is a growing list of irritants in the U.S.-Russian relationship. Russia is unhappy about a U.S.-backed bid for independence for . The United States wants Putin to do more to press Iran to abandon its suspected nuclear weapons program. Seeking a better footing in the relationship, Putin has accepted Bush's invitation for a July 1-2 meeting at his family's compound in Kennebunkport, Maine. Bush was expected to face pressure in Heiligendamm over what is widely perceived as U.S. footdragging in combatting global warming. But the president tried to pre-empt critics with his proposal last week challenging major polluting countries to agree on a target for reducing greenhouse gases. Still, Bush's proposal to let each country decide how much to do leaves a gap between Washington on one side and Merkel and the on the other. Merkel had hoped that concrete goals to reduce emissions would be a centerpiece of her leadership of the G-8. Hadley gave Merkel a diplomatic nudge to support Bush's stand. "It's not about upstaging Angela Merkel. Quite the contrary," Hadley said. "It is not an alternative to anybody's plan, but it is an effort to identify a way forward and, quite frankly, it's an opportunity for Angela Merkel to preside over a very successful G-8." Along with his stops in Prague, Poland and Heiligendamm, Bush will visit Italy, Albania and Bulgaria. Full Coverage: Bush Administration Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note AP, 34 minutes ago Bush begins European trip, facing tense G8 summit Reuters, 1 hour, 23 minutes ago White House follows new path to secrecy AP via Yahoo! News, Jun 01 Q&A: President Bush's climate goals at BBC, May 31 Bush shelters from Putin's rhetoric at Financial Times, Jun 04 Bush Goes to Europe in Wake of Putin' Threat at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Hang in there, America: Competent leadership is just 600-plus days away at McClatchy Newspapers, May 17 Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Romney clash over immigration Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe Robberies surge on violent crime survey McCain, Romney clash over immigration U.S. cuts back climate checks from space minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Connecticut Governor Jodi Rell listen as U.S. President George W. Bush speaks during a meeting... Riots at German rally before G8 German police battle hundreds of protesters at an anti-globalisation march ahead of next week&#39;s G8 summit. &raquo; More BBC video Bush heads to G8 Summit President Bush heads to the G8 Summit in Germany this week, aiming to convince U.S. allies he&#39;s serious about tackling global warming. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video G-8 protesters, police clash in Germany Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) White House News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/terrorism_plot Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot - Yahoo! News Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot By LARRY McSHANE, Associated Press Writer Mon Jun 4, 11:57 AM ET NEW YORK - Four men accused of plotting to bomb a fuel pipeline feeding the city's busiest airport were so taken by an informant that they were sure God had sent him to them, authorities said. The informant made several overseas trips to discuss the plot against John F. Kennedy International Airport, even visiting a radical Muslim group's compound in Trinidad, officials said. He also joined the plotters on airport surveillance trips &#151; where authorities were waiting, they said. The suspects were convinced he was guided by a higher purpose: The ringleader believed the informant "had been sent by Allah to be the one" to pull off the bombing, according to a federal complaint. Authorities said the plot, revealed Saturday, demonstrated the growing importance of informants in efforts to combat terrorism, particularly as smaller radical groups become more aggressive. Accused mastermind Russell Defreitas, 63, is now in custody in New York, where he was due to have a bail hearing Wednesday. But two other suspects, Kareem Ibrahim and Abdul Kadir, a former member of Guyana's Parliament, were in Trinidad and will fight extradition to the United States, their lawyer, Rajid Persad, told a Trinidadian court Monday. The two made their initial court appearance there on one count each of conspiracy to commit a terrorist act against the government of the United States. The judge set a bail hearing for June 11 and an extradition hearing Aug. 2. Authorities in Trinidad are seeking a fourth suspect, Abdel Nur. Tom Corrigan, a former member of the -New York Police Department Joint Terrorism Task Force, said the Kennedy airport case and the recent plot to attack Fort Dix illustrated the need for inside information. Six men were arrested in a plot to attack soldiers at the New Jersey military base after an FBI informant infiltrated that group. "These have been two significant cases back-to-back where informants were used," Corrigan said. "These terrorists are in our own backyard. They may have to reach out to people they don't necessarily trust, but they need &#151; for guns, explosives, whatever." Without informants, Corrigan said, investigators are often left with little more than educated guesswork. "In most cases, you can't get from A to B without an informant," the ex-NYPD detective said. In the Kennedy airport case, the informant was a twice-convicted drug dealer who found himself in the midst of what investigators called a terrorist plot conceived as more devastating than the Sept. 11 attacks. "Would you like to die as a martyr?" the informant was asked, according to the indictment. He unhesitatingly replied yes and soon was making surveillance trips around the airport &#151; the "chicken farm," as the planners dubbed their target. Authorities said the JFK scheme was an example of homegrown terrorism. Defreitas, 63, immigrated to the U.S. more than 30 years ago, but he told the federal informant that his feelings of disgust toward his adopted homeland had lingered for years. "Before terrorism started in this country," he said in one secretly recorded conversation. Defreitas was arrested Friday night outside Brooklyn's Lindenwood Diner &#151; a spot once bugged by federal officials tracking former Gambino family boss John A. "Junior" Gotti. The four Muslim men accused in the JFK plot didn't turn to Pakistan, for support after targeting the airport, home to an average of 1,000 daily flights and 45 million passengers annually. Instead, according to a federal complaint, the informant, Ibrahim and Defreitas visited a compound belonging to Jamaat al Muslimeen, a radical Islamic group known for launching a bloody 1990 coup attempt in Trinidad that involved taking the prime minister and his Cabinet hostage. It left 24 people dead. Though Jamaat al Muslimeen did have contact with the men accused in the Kennedy airport plot, it is not accused of offering them any support. The group, whose followers are largely black converts to Sunni Islam, has faded as a political force in Trinidad as its leader, Yasin Abu Bakr, fends off criminal charges of inciting violence. The rebels in the 1990 raid on Parliament surrendered and were pardoned. When Defreitas discussed his radical "brothers" with the informant, he made it clear they were not Arabs, but from Trinidad and Guyana. The complaint made clear the informant had deeply infiltrated the group. Defreitas, a retired JFK airport cargo worker, made four reconnaissance missions to the airport, authorities said. They captured each one on audio and video equipment. Ibrahim and another suspect, Abdul Kadir, were in custody in Trinidad awaiting extradition hearings. Officials identified Kadir as a former mayor of a Guyanese town and a member of the country's Parliament. Associated Press Writers Tony Fraser in Port-of-Spain, Trinidad, and Pat Milton in New York contributed to this report. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 2 minutes ago Group denies link to NYC terror plot AP, 37 minutes ago One Had Stature and One Didn't, but Neither Seemed an Extremist at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 This terror plot was homegrown at Newsday, Jun 03 Hunt for fourth man in NY airport terror plot at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Terrorists, Chemicals and Trains at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 21 Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Women prosecuted for smuggling children Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Anti-war Marine blasts military Vt. secession movement gains traction Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Women prosecuted for smuggling children Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Fuel tanks are seen at JFK International Airport in New York Sunday, June 3, ... JFK Airport Terror Plot Informant Helped Bust JFK Plot Investigators averted recent terror threat via outreach to Muslim community. &raquo; More ABC News video Drug convict helped bust JFK plot A convicted drug dealer secretly fed information to federal investigators, playing a key role in exposing a terrorism plot against JFK airport. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_en_mo/film_seacrest_knocked_up Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' - Yahoo! News Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' By ERIN CARLSON, Associated Press Writer NEW YORK - Ryan Seacrest is known as a lot of things &#151; slick "American Idol" ringmaster, hotshot radio deejay, ubiquitous E! channel host &#151; but funny guy's not one of them. Which makes his scene-stealing cameo in "Knocked Up" such an amusing surprise. Even more so because he's the butt of the joke. Seacrest sends up his pompous image in the Judd Apatow-directed comedy about an ambitious entertainment reporter ( ) whose life is flipped when she learns she is pregnant. She takes her job seriously at E! Entertainment Television &#151; but not as seriously as the film-version Seacrest, who launches into a riotous rant during a scene that lasts barely two minutes. Seacrest, playing himself, becomes ticked off on the set when throws off his busy schedule by arriving at her leisure for an interview. He angrily suggests that maybe he'll retaliate by asking for her thoughts on an "exit strategy" in the Middle East. "I don't understand the young talent in this town," the movie Seacrest goes on. "It doesn't make any sense. I got four jobs &#151; hell, I'm more famous than half the people we talk to anyway!" The rant then escalates into an R-rated diatribe with Seacrest dropping the F-bomb and denouncing the superficial workings of the entertainment industry. The apoplectic host finally has to be ushered into the green room with a promise of a cookie in an effort to calm him down. Seacrest is not nearly as divalike in real life. ... Or is he? At the beginning of a recent telephone interview with the Associated Press, the 32-year-old took a moment to jokingly exercise his authority: "Hang on one second &#151; "Linda, WHERE'S MY LUNCH?! ... Sorry, just kidding," he deadpanned, back on the phone. Seacrest, whose poker-faced demeanor during those ominous "Idol" elimination shows was spoofed recently on "Saturday Night Live," said he relished exposing his not-so-serious side in "Knocked Up." "Oh, I love it! I don't mind being the butt of the joke. ... It doesn't really bother me. I quite enjoy it," said Seacrest. He even suggested a headline for this story: "He's funny and YOU don't know it!" In the movie, he makes another statement: He can laugh at himself. "I believe that one of the things I've tried to do is work hard and take the business very seriously. ... But, at the same time, you can't take the (TV personality) role too seriously. Then you really begin to lose it." When it came time to film the scene, Seacrest &#151; nervous about how he'd be "received by the movie world" &#151; was delighted to "have fun and ad lib" with Apatow ("The 40 Year-Old Virgin"), who is big on improvisation and collaboration. "I'm not used to a script," Seacrest said. Apatow, he related, asked him: "Hey, can you use a bad word and make fun of a couple people and, at the end of this whole scene, really make sure you make fun of yourself?" His response: "Absolutely, let's roll." "This was a very therapeutic exercise," he said. "I mean, I didn't want to stop that day. It's a shame I only got to do it for however long I got to do it." NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show Hilton completes first night in LA jail Appeals court hands broadcasters a win Spoleto festival to honor Menotti Hilton completes first night in LA jail NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show As `Sopranos' end nears, so does Tony's LEAKING FAUCETS ARE TORTURE FOR WIFE MARRIED TO BIG DRIP Appeals court hands broadcasters a win Web Extra: Paris Hilton Statue Gets Jail Suit WCCO Minneapolis - 47 minutes ago A Very Simple Life: Paris Hilton Checks Into Jail CBS 2 / KCAL 9 Los Angeles - 1 hour, 49 minutes ago Check out highlights from the MTV Movie Awards AP minutes ago Paris Hilton gets no respect from fellow celebs AP minutes ago Order a Free Vacation Planning DVD. See All the Magic of Disney Parks. Mountain Dew® Transform Your Summer Transformers Movie Sweepstakes. Protect. Destroy. July 4, 2007. The Police 28 Classic Tracks - 2Cd Set The Police's 30th anniversary 2CD set features 28 classic tracks. Ryan Seacrest poses at the DETAILS magazine party presented by Emporio Armani celebrating 2007 Mavericks... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Movie News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Living in a porn-driven, &#39;look-at-me&#39; culture Send Joel Siegel Your Movie Reviews and Watch to See If You Make the Cut! Oh, what a night for the first live MTV set Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_en_tv/tv_silverman_ugly_betty NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show - Yahoo! News NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show 1 hour, 22 minutes ago NEW YORK - His job this fall will be to beat "Ugly Betty," but NBC's new entertainment chief is keeping his name on the show. Ben Silverman, appointed last week as co-chairman of NBC's entertainment operation with Marc Graboff, accepted a Peabody Award on Monday for ABC's "Ugly Betty." Silverman and his production company helped remake the Spanish-language telenovela for an American audience. He said backstage that he plans to keep his executive producer credit on the series next season despite his NBC job. He won't be involved in planning episodes, he said. In its freshman season on ABC Thursday nights, "Ugly Betty" won a Golden Globe award for best comedy. Its star, America Ferrera, was named best actress in a comedy. "This is the kind of show I want on NBC," he said. Silverman's company, Reveille Studios, also developed the BBC series "The Office" for an American audience. That NBC show won a Peabody, too, giving Silverman a chance to take home an award for a show he'll actually be responsible for next fall. One of Silverman's biggest challenges is reviving NBC's Thursday lineup. Once a legendary source of strength, NBC has been suffering in the ratings that night with four comedies including "The Office." "All of the shows are quality," he said. "It's going to be my job to figure out how to get them sampled." NBC is owned by General Electric Co. ABC is owned by The Walt Disney Co. Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' Hilton completes first night in LA jail Appeals court hands broadcasters a win Spoleto festival to honor Menotti Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' Hilton completes first night in LA jail As `Sopranos' end nears, so does Tony's Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' LEAKING FAUCETS ARE TORTURE FOR WIFE MARRIED TO BIG DRIP Appeals court hands broadcasters a win Web Extra: Paris Hilton Statue Gets Jail Suit WCCO Minneapolis - 47 minutes ago A Very Simple Life: Paris Hilton Checks Into Jail CBS 2 / KCAL 9 Los Angeles - 1 hour, 49 minutes ago Check out highlights from the MTV Movie Awards AP minutes ago Paris Hilton gets no respect from fellow celebs AP minutes ago Order a Free Vacation Planning DVD. See All the Magic of Disney Parks. Mountain Dew® Transform Your Summer Transformers Movie Sweepstakes. Protect. Destroy. July 4, 2007. The Police 28 Classic Tracks - 2Cd Set The Police's 30th anniversary 2CD set features 28 classic tracks. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Television News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Living in a porn-driven, &#39;look-at-me&#39; culture Send Joel Siegel Your Movie Reviews and Watch to See If You Make the Cut! Oh, what a night for the first live MTV set Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_sp_fo_ne/fbn_bears_tank_johnson_suspended NFL suspends Tank Johnson for 8 games - Yahoo! News NFL suspends Tank Johnson for 8 games By DAVE GOLDBERG, AP Football Writer NEW YORK - Tank Johnson of the was suspended by the NFL for the first eight games of the 2007 regular season for violating the league's new personal conduct policy. The defensive tackle recently served a two-month jail stint on a probation violation on gun-related charges. He's the third player suspended by commissioner Roger Goodell in little more than a month for off-field behavior. In April, Goodell suspended defensive back Adam "Pacman" Jones for the entire 2007 season and wide receiver Chris Henry for eight games. Jones is appealing his suspension. Goodell said Johnson's suspension could be reduced to six games if he has no further involvement with law enforcement and undergoes counseling. Johnson stands to lose $255,000, based on his salary for next season of $510,000, if the suspension lasts the entire eight games. After meeting with Goodell upon his release last month, Johnson said he was ready to accept whatever punishment Goodell handed down and that he wants to become the NFL's "Man of the Year," the player honored for being its best citizen. There was no statement from the league other than the short announcement of the suspension. It said Goodell would review Johnson's status before Oct. 1 to determine whether to reduce his suspension by two games. Last December, police raided the 300-pound defensive tackle's suburban Chicago home and found six unregistered firearms &#151; a violation of his probation on an earlier gun charge. That charge stemmed from Johnson's 2005 arrest after a Chicago nightclub valet reported seeing Johnson with a handgun in his SUV. He subsequently pleaded guilty to a misdemeanor charge. Two days after the raid, Willie B. Posey, Johnson's bodyguard who had been arrested after the raid, was shot and killed in an early-morning fight while he and Johnson were at a Chicago nightclub. Johnson was suspended by the Bears for one game for being at the club. He played with the team in the Super Bowl. In March, Johnson began his jail term for violating his probation. Last month, he pleaded guilty to a misdemeanor weapons charge as part of a deal with prosecutors that kept him from serving more time in jail. He was ordered to serve 45 days, which he was able to serve concurrently with the sentence for violating his probation. Johnson met with Goodell for 90 minutes in New York on May 18. "I feel like whatever sanction he imposes, I'm man enough to take it and I know that once I get back on the field, that chapter of my life is closed and I can move on with a sense of closure," Johnson said after the meeting. He called the commissioner "a fair man" and added: "One day I want to be the face of the league for guys who have come through adversity, came through it and ultimately became the Man of the Year in the NFL. That would be a tremendous ending to the story." Truex takes first career win at Dover Source: Donovan wants out of Magic deal Nadal advances to French Open quarters Former NASCAR chairman Bill France dies Broncos sign mammoth tackle Sam Adams Donovan wants out of deal with Magic Source: Donovan wants out of Magic deal Former NASCAR chairman Bill France dies Truex takes first career win at Dover Donovan having second thoughts over Orlando job: report Chicago Bears Tickets - Huge Selection Browse through the Internets complete collection of tickets available. Reebok Run Easy, Learn What It's About Map your favorite runs, meet runners. Share playlist, photos and more. Bad Credit Stopping You? Lower Your Bills 60% - Become Debt Free 12-36mo. Get Out of Debt Now. Chicago Bears defensive lineman Tank Johnson speaks at a news conference at the Bears football... Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Minor League Coach Has Major Meltdown News and notes on the PGA Tour&#39;s top 20 golfers Sports news stories and photos &raquo; All Most Popular SOCCER ON Y! SPORTS Get the latest news, photos and schedules. &raquo; More from Y! Sports MLB ON Y! SPORTS Get the latest on winter meetings, trades and news. &raquo; More from Y! Sports Get the latest news, analysis and more. &raquo; More from Y! Sports Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_go_ot/congressman_probe Feds say La. congressman to be indicted - Yahoo! News Feds say La. congressman to be indicted By LARA JAKES JORDAN, Associated Press Writer Mon Jun 4, 1:11 PM ET WASHINGTON - An indictment charging Rep. William Jefferson ( ), D-La., in a long-running bribery investigation is being announced Monday, federal officials said. The indictment is being handed up in U.S. District Court in Alexandria. A press conference was being organized for late Monday in Washington to discuss the case. Full Coverage: U.S. Congress US Senate takes up immigration bill AFP, 2 minutes ago Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe AP, 2 minutes ago Congress' vote on Iraq war is only a prelude to a longer struggle at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Apr 30 Liberal lawmakers may sway key vote on Iraq war at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 15 House GOP Uses Procedural Tactic To Frustrate Democratic Majority at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 19 GOP Crowd Forming for Shot at Freshman Walz in Minnesota 1 CQPolitics.com via Yahoo! News, May 09 at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 21 Beyond the Bush veto at Boston Globe, May 01 Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Romney clash over immigration Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey McCain, Romney clash over immigration U.S. cuts back climate checks from space minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. US Democratic Representative William Jefferson, pictured in 2006, who allegedly stashed 90,000 dollars in his... Rep. William Jefferson Indicted Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) U.S. Government - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_af/somalia Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia - Yahoo! News Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia By SALAD DUHUL, Associated Press Writer 2 hours, 51 minutes ago MOGADISHU, Somalia - Ethiopian troops fired Monday at a would-be suicide bomber speeding toward their base, blowing up the car and killing the bomber and a civilian standing nearby, officials said. "This was a terrorist act," Deputy Defense Minister Salad Ali Jelle said. The attack came one day after a suicide car bomber drove through a roadblock guarding the prime minister's home and rammed the vehicle into a wall, killing seven people. The prime minister was unharmed. The violence in the Somali capital of Mogadishu has undermined the government's claims to have defeated Islamic insurgents who have promised an -style guerrilla war. The battles have pitted the government and Ethiopian troops propping it up against clan rivals and Islamic insurgents. Prime Minister Ali Mohamed Gedi said Monday that the attack targeting him over the weekend was meant to disrupt a peace and reconciliation conference planned for later this month. "The whole objective of the insurgents or the terrorists is to stop or delay the national reconciliation conference. We will not do it. We will continue," Gedi said outside his home, which was damaged in Sunday's blast. "We will try to pacify the capital city before the conference." Jelle has blamed the attack on "terrorists linked to al-Qaida." Germany, which holds the presidency, issued a statement Monday condemning the attack on the prime minister "as an assault on the whole peace and reconciliation process in Somalia" and saying a Somali working for the was among those killed. Sunday's attack was at least the third attempt on Gedi's life since he returned to Somalia in May 2005. No one has claimed responsibility for the attacks. Meanwhile, Somali pirates who hijacked a Taiwan-flagged fishing vessel in mid-May off this country's lawless coast killed one of the 16 crew members because the ship's owners have not paid a ransom, a maritime official said Monday. The pirates threatened to kill other crew members if their demands are not met, said Andrew Mwangura, head of the Kenyan chapter of the Seafarers Assistance Program. He cited a relative of one of the captives, who was allowed to call his family. "The gunmen have established contact with the owner of the ship but it appears that he was giving them empty promises," Mwangura said. The ship &#151; Ching Fong Hwa 168 &#151; had two Taiwanese and 12 Chinese crew members on board when it was hijacked 137 miles northeast of Mogadishu. Somalia does not have a coast guard or navy after more than a decade of anarchy. The current government was formed in 2004 but has struggled to assert any real control throughout the country. Although piracy is rampant off Somalia's lawless coast, killing crew members is relatively rare, Mwangura said. He said pirates have killed four crew members in the past 10 years. Associated Press writers Mohamed Olad Hassan in Mogadishu and Malkhadir M. Muhumed in Nairobi, Kenya, contributed to this report. Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia AP, 2 hours, 47 minutes ago Islamist militants claim suicide attack on Somali PM Reuters, Mon Jun 4, 12:57 PM ET Somali pop stars take on tradition at BBC, May 18 Mogadishu seeks a makeover at BBC, May 14 Briton 'killed in US missile attack in Somalia' at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 Pirates 'kill' hostage in Somalia at BBC, Jun 04 Arab League Has Role in Somalia Peace Deal at allAfrica.com, Mar 30 Only Bold Action in Somalia Will Put End to the Chaos at allAfrica.com, Mar 30 Group claims captured troops were killed denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Group claims captured troops were killed denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Ethiopian troops patrol the street of Mogadishu, Somalia, Monday June 4, 2007. Somalia's prime minister... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Africa &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostviewed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_as/china_remembering_tiananmen Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform - Yahoo! News Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform By ANITA CHANG, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 56 minutes ago BEIJING - For the first time in 18 years, Ding Zilin marked the anniversary of her son's death with a visit to the place where he was shot amid a violent government crackdown on protests at Tiananmen Square. Police usually are quick to snuff out any memorials in Beijing for those killed in the crackdown that culminated in June 4, 1989, while China's government still calls the seven-week Tiananmen protest a counter-revolutionary riot and has yet to fully disclose what happened. But with China's human rights record under renewed scrutiny ahead of the 2008 Olympics, survivors of the bloody crackdown in Beijing marked the event's 18th anniversary on Monday by demanding political reform. And Ding, who for years was placed under house arrest during Tiananmen anniversaries and other sensitive times, wept on the eve of the anniversary as she placed a photo of her son on the spot where he died a few kilometers west of Tiananmen. "It's been 18 years and I felt like I let him down and let down the others who died with him," she said of her son, who was killed as he hid behind a flower bed from soldiers enforcing martial law on the night of June 3. He had turned 17 the day before. In Hong Kong on Monday &#151; the only place in China where a large, public commemoration is allowed &#151; tens of thousands gathered to mourn the dead at a candlelight vigil. In Beijing's Tiananmen Square, there were no immediate reports of protests and only tourists gathered to watch a daily flag-raising ceremony amid tight security. Ding, co-founder of the Tiananmen Mothers, a group that represents families of those who died, said police did not try to stop her Sunday night, though plainclothes agents may have been observing the vigil. "Right now, this is all I can do. Not getting justice for them, we're still pushing for it but there's been no response," said Ding, who has campaigned to get the government to acknowledge those killed in the crackdown and compensate their families. "Their spirits are obviously not at peace." Most of the surviving students who led the Tiananmen protests have drifted away from activism and into careers in business or other professions, but prominent student leader Wang Dan has continued to push for political reform in China as he pursues a doctorate in history at Harvard University. He said in a videotaped message that China's recent economic success cannot make up for the crackdown and killed hundreds, maybe thousands, of people. "Who can guarantee things that happened 18 years ago will not happen 18 years later?" Wang said. "Even if we become more powerful economically, China still cannot rise in international society." Another former student leader, Wu'er Kaixi, lamented that the memory of Tiananmen appears to be fading worldwide. "The Chinese government is unwilling to face the truth and seems to hope that the 'problem' of June 4 will simply go away," Wu'er, who has worked as a businessman and radio broadcaster in Taiwan, told the most part, the world seems willing to go along with this." In the former British colony of Hong Kong, many residents in 1989 supported the Tiananmen protesters and the violence raised fears that the Communist leadership would not honor its promise to allow Hong Kong the civil liberties its people enjoyed under British rule. But 10 years after the hand-over, the city still enjoys freedoms that people on the mainland can only dream about. Street protests are common and the press frequently criticizes the government, though media watchdogs say self-censorship is common. A candlelight vigil Monday night filled up six soccer fields at Victoria Park near downtown Hong Kong. Amy Chan, 60, brought her 5-year-old granddaughter. "Although she is young, we need to let her know the history," Chan said. Tonny Chin, 50, a clerk, said he has attended the vigil every year since 1989. "The June fourth incident is a tragedy for China," he said. "We need to vindicate it." New York-based Human Rights Watch said Beijing's failure to account for the crackdown casts a pall on its campaign to project a new image ahead of the Olympics in 14 months. "Beijing &#151; and by extension, the 2008 &#151; will remain tarnished by this legacy until the Chinese government provides a complete and truthful account of what happened in June 1989," said Sophie Richardson, deputy Asia director of the human rights group. Associated Press writers Dikky Sinn and William Foreman in Hong Kong and Annie Huang in Taipei, Taiwan, contributed to this report. China won't adopt caps on gas emissions AP, 1 hour, 8 minutes ago Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform AP, 1 hour, 53 minutes ago China, nuclear technology, and a US sale The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, May 30 Can Shanghai turn green and grow? at BBC, May 27 China vows to 'blaze new path to industrialisation' at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 Pollution puts Chinese lake off limits The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Corruption in China: The anger boils over at International Herald Tribune, May 29 U.S. must address risk of untraceable, low-quality food ingredients from China at Pioneer Press, Apr 23 Group claims captured troops were killed denies link to NYC terror plot Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Protesters attend candlelight vigil to mark the crackdown on the Tiananmen Square in Hong Kong... Tiananmen Square anniversary marked with vigil Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Asia News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
